
In this bicentenary year, Australians are looking back over the events of the last two hundred years. This is well worth while because the events link together to tell a story of remarkable achievement.
Of course, we do not know what was going through the mind of Captain Phillip when he stepped ashore at Sydney Cove, but I am sure he could never have imagined such an event as this, or the scene before us today.
I also rather doubt that the founding fathers of the Australian Federation could have foreseen that their work would be crowned by such a confident expression of Australia's faith in parliamentary democracy.
I am sure that they had every hope that the new Federal constitution would be a success, but neither they, nor anyone else, could have predicted that no less than three important national parliamentary occasions would fall on the same day of the year, and involve three generations of my family.
It was on 9 May 1901 that the members and senators, elected by the citizens of the new Commonwealth of Australia, gathered in Melbourne for the opening of the first session of the first national Parliament by my grandfather.
It was also on this same day in 1927 that the provisional Parliament House was opened here in the new capital of Canberra by my father. So, in the bicentennial year of the arrival of the First Fleet, and in the seventy-fifth anniversary year of the foundation of Canberra, there can surely be no more appropriate day for the opening of this magnificent new home for the Commonwealth Parliament.
The completion of this splendid building has put the finishing touch to Walter Burley Griffin's grand design chosen by the Australian Government seventy-six years ago. It is as if all the other buildings of the great national institutions had been waiting for his, the greatest of them all, to take its rightful place as their centre and focus.
This is a special occasion for the Parliament, but it is also a very important day for all the people of Australia. After eighty-seven years of Federation, a permanent home has been provided for Parliament, which is both the living expression of that Federation and the embodiment of the democratic principles of freedom, equality and justice.
Parliamentary democracy is a compelling ideal, but it is a fragile institution. It cannot be imposed and it is only too easily destroyed. It needs the positive dedication of the people as a whole, and of their elected representatives, to make it work.
The earliest free settlers brought their ideals of a democratic society with them, and succeeding generations of Australians have inherited those principles and put them to work in what we know as the parliamentary system.
Commitment to parliamentary democracy lies at the heart of this nation's maturity, tolerance and humanity. This is surely one of the characteristics that has attracted so many people to come to Australia from countries which do not enjoy the benefits of the parliamentary system in such large measure.
This new Parliament House will become the work place for the men and wome into whose hands Australians choose to place legislative and executive responsibility. The chambers will become the centres for debate on all the pressing issues of government, and future generations of Australians will look to those who work here for national security, wise legislation and fair administration.
I am sure that many members will feel a pang of regret as they leave the old and familiar Parliament House. I have many happy recollections of events in the simple elegance of its hall and chambers, but it has been obvious for years that a larger building with more modern facilities was needed.
It was equally obvious that it would never be easy to make the decision to build a new House. I can only say that I am deeply impressed by the speed and skill with which this site has been transformed into such an impressive and functional home for the national Parliament.
I had the opportunity to visit the site at an early stage in the construction, and I am delighted to be here today to see it complete. I offer my warmest congratulations to the architects, to the members of the Parliament House Construction Authority, to the contractors and sub-contractors, and to the artists and crafts people, whose creative talents enrich the interior, and, particularly, to Michael Tjakamarra Nelson, whose mosaic is in the forecourt.
Together they have given the whole complex a distinctive Australian character. More than ten thousand men and women can take great pride in the parts they have played in the creation of this symbol of Australian unity and democracy.
The laws of the Commonwealth of Australia are enacted in the name of The Queen and the two Houses of Parliament. It is fitting, therefore, and a great pleasure for me, to offer my best wishes to all those who will be giving their service to the nation within these walls, and to declare open the new Parliament House of the Commonwealth of Australia.

Prime Minister, Ladies and Gentlemen
When Prince Philip and I were married on this day fifty years ago, Britain had just endured six years of war, emerging battered but victorious. Prince Philip had served in the Royal Navy in the Far East, while I was grappling, in the ATS, with the complexities of the combustion engine and learning to drive an ambulance with care.
Today, Prime Minister, we accept your generous hospitality in a very different Britain. The Cold War is over and our country is at peace. The economy in your charge, and which you inherited, is soundly based and growing. And, during these last fifty years, the mass-media culture has transformed our lives in any number of ways, allowing us to learn more about our fellow human beings than, in 1947, we would have thought possible.
What a remarkable fifty years they have been, for the world, for the Commonwealth and for Britain. Think what we would have missed if we had never heard the Beatles or seen Margot Fonteyn dance, never have watched television, used a mobile telephone or surfed the Net. Or, to be honest, listened to other people talking about surfing the Net.
We would never have heard someone speak from the Moon, never have watched England win the World Cup or Red Rum three Grand Nationals. We would never have heard that Everest had been scaled, DNA unravelled, the Channel tunnel built, hip replacements become commonplace. Above all, speaking personally, we would never have known the joys of having children and grandchildren.
As you say Prime Minister, since I came to the throne in 1952, ten Prime Ministers have served the British people and have come to see me each week at Buckingham Palace. The first, Winston Churchill, had charged with the cavalry at Omdurman. You, Prime Minister, were born in the year of my Coronation.
You have all had, however, one thing in common. Your advice to me has been invaluable, as has that from your counterparts, past and present, in the other countries of which I am Queen. I have listened carefully to it all. I say, most sincerely, that I could not have done my job without it.
For I know that, despite the huge constitutional difference between a hereditary monarchy and an elected government, in reality the gulf is not so wide. They are complementary institutions, each with its own role to play. And each, in its different way, exists only with the support and consent of the people. That consent, or the lack of it, is expressed for you, Prime Minister, through the ballot box. It is a tough, even brutal, system but at least the message is a clear one for all to read.
For us, a Royal Family, however, the message is often harder to read, obscured as it can be by deference, rhetoric or the conflicting currents of public opinion. But read it we must. I have done my best, with Prince Philip's constant love and help, to interpret it correctly through the years of our marriage and of my reign as your Queen. And we shall, as a family, try together to do so in the future.
It often falls to the Prime Minister, and the Government of the day, to be the bearer of the messages sent from people to Sovereign. Prime Minister, I know that you, like your predecessors, will always pass such messages, as you read them, without fear or favour. I shall value that, and am grateful for your assurances of the loyalty and support of your Government in years to come.
I wish you wisdom and God's help in your determination that Britain should remain a country to be proud of. And, as one working couple to another, Prince Philip and I hope that on 29 March 2030 you and your wife will be celebrating your own Golden Wedding.
And talking of the future, I believe that there is an air of confidence in this country of ours just now. I pray that we, people, Government and Royal Family, for we are one, can prove it to be justified and that Britain will enter the next millennium, glad, confident and a truly United Kingdom.
This, too, is an opportunity for Prince Philip and me to offer, in the words of one of the most beautiful prayers in the English language, our humble and hearty thanks to all those in Britain and around the world who have welcomed us and sustained us and our family, in the good times and the bad, so unstintingly over many years.
This has given us strength, most recently during the sad days after the tragedy of Diana's death. It is you, if I may now speak to all of you directly, who have seen us through, and helped us to make our duty fun. We are deeply grateful to you, each and every one.
Yesterday I listened as Prince Philip spoke at the Guildhall, and I then proposed our host's health. Today the roles are reversed.
All too often, I fear, Prince Philip has had to listen to me speaking. Frequently we have discussed my intended speech beforehand and, as you will imagine, his views have been expressed in a forthright manner.
He is someone who doesn't take easily to compliments but he has, quite simply, been my strength and stay all these years, and I, and his whole family, and this and many other countries, owe him a debt greater than he would ever claim, or we shall ever know.
Prime Minister, thank you for helping us to celebrate a very special day in our lives.

My Lord Mayor,
Could I say, first, how delighted I am that the Lady Mayoress is here today.
This great hall has provided me with some of the most memorable events of my life. The hospitality of the City of London is famous around the world, but nowhere is it more appreciated than among the members of my family. I am deeply grateful that you, my Lord Mayor, and the Corporation, have seen fit to mark the fortieth anniversary of my Accession with this splendid lunch, and by giving me a picture which I will greatly cherish.
Thank you also for inviting representatives of so many organisations with which I and my family have special connections, in some cases stretching back over several generations. To use an expression more common north of the Border, this is a real gathering of the clans
1992 is not a year on which I shall look back with undiluted pleasure. In the words of one of my more sympathetic correspondents, it has turned out to be an Annus Horribilis I suspect that I am not alone in thinking it so. Indeed, I suspect that there are very few people or institutions unaffected by these last months of worldwide turmoil and uncertainty. This generosity and whole-hearted kindness of the Corporation of the City to Prince Philip and me would be welcome at any time, but at this particular moment, in the aftermath of Friday's tragic fire at Windsor, it is especially so.
And, after this last weekend, we appreciate all the more what has been set before us today. Years of experience, however, have made us a bit more canny than the lady, less well versed than us in the splendours of City hospitality, who, when she was offered a balloon glass for her brandy, asked for only half a glass, please
It is possible to have too much of a good thing. A well-meaning Bishop was obviously doing his best when he told Queen Victoria, Maam, we cannot pray too often, nor too fervently, for the Royal Family. The Queen's reply was, Too fervently, no, too often, yes. I, like Queen Victoria, have always been a believer in that old maxim moderation in all things.
I sometimes wonder how future generations will judge the events of this tumultuous year. I dare say that history will take a slightly more moderate view than that of some contemporary commentators. Distance is well-known to lend enchantment, even to the less attractive views. After all, it has the inestimable advantage of hindsight.
But it can also lend an extra dimension to judgement, giving it a leavening of moderation and compassion, even of wisdom, that is sometimes lacking in the reactions of those whose task it is in life to offer instant opinions on all things great and small.
No section of the community has all the virtues, neither does any have all the vices. I am quite sure that most people try to do their jobs as best they can, even if the result is not always entirely successful. He who has never failed to reach perfection has a right to be the harshest critic.
There can be no doubt, of course, that criticism is good for people and institutions that are part of public life. No institution, City, Monarchy, whatever, should expect to be free from the scrutiny of those who give it their loyalty and support, not to mention those who don't.
But we are all part of the same fabric of our national society and that scrutiny, by one part of another, can be just as effective if it is made with a touch of gentleness, good humour and understanding.
This sort of questioning can also act, and it should do so, as an effective engine for change. The City is a good example of the way the process of change can be incorporated into the stability and continuity of a great institution. I particularly admire, my Lord Mayor, the way in which the City has adapted so nimbly to what the Prayer Book calls The changes and chances of this mortal life.
You have set an example of how it is possible to remain effective and dynamic without losing those indefinable qualities, style and character. We only have to look around this great hall to see the truth of that.
Forty years is quite a long time. I am glad to have had the chance to witness, and to take part in, many dramatic changes in life in this country. But I am glad to say that the magnificent standard of hospitality given on so many occasions to the Sovereign by the Lord Mayor of London has not changed at all. It is an outward symbol of one other unchanging factor which I value above all, the loyalty given to me and to my family by so many people in this country, and the Commonwealth, throughout my reign.
You, my Lord Mayor, and all those whose prayers, fervent, I hope, but not too frequent, have sustained me through all these years, are friends indeed. Prince Philip and I give you all, wherever you may be, our most humble thanks.
And now I ask you to rise and drink the health of the Lord Mayor and Corporation of London.


Mr. Premier, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you very much for your warm Queensland welcome. I am very glad to be back here again in Brisbane.
It is one hundred and forty-two years ago since my great-great grandmother, Queen Victoria, selected this State's name. When she did so neither she nor any Queenslander of the time could have foreseen how this State would have grown and changed.
Today it is a vital and confident society, drawing the best from its citizens from every background and known everywhere for its energy and hospitality. During our visit we have been able to see something of the extraordinary variety of the State from the rain forest of the North and the outback at Roma to the resorts of the Sunshine Coast and today this magnificent city of Brisbane.
It is wonderful to see so many of you here to celebrate the first birthday of the Roma Street Parkland.
On this last day of my visit to Australia I would like to express my gratitude to you all for the warmth of the welcome Prince Philip and I have received at every stage.
Although the visit has been brief it has provided both Prince Philip and I with the chance to witness at first hand the way in which Australia is facing up to the challenges and opportunities of the Twenty-first Century. Once again we have both been struck by both the diversity as well as the dynamism of Australia, and the vigour and humour of Australians everywhere.
We leave with our respect for this great country strengthened. Our good wishes go to you all.


Mr Prime Minister, Mr Secretary General, President Mbeki, Ladies and Gentlemen,
I am very pleased to be with you today in Coolum. I am delighted that this meeting takes place in Australia, one of the Commonwealth's founding members. I know it was originally planned to coincide with the Centenary of Federation last year, but that is still recent enough for us to congratulate the people of this country on that major milestone in their history. May I thank you, Mr Prime Minister, for the warm welcome we have all received in Australia.
May I also express my best wishes to you, Mr Secretary General, as you embark on your important responsibilities at this your first Heads of Government Meeting in your present post, although you are of course no stranger to Commonwealth meetings.
I hope that these summits provide us all with an opportunity, every two years or so, to stand back form our daily preoccupations and consider what binds our nations together. We all know that the Commonwealth evolved not from an architect's drawing board, but out of history, to form a free partnership of nations.
It is an organisation which had defined its own values and ideals and its particular focus on issues important to us all, notably sustainable development and good governance. It has also developed its own style, of informality, tolerance, and an insistence on bringing all along together on the sometimes difficult path of building consensus.
And this tradition of consensus is in spite of the remarkable variety of its members. Every region of the world is represented, every size of nation at all stages of development, and all the world's religions are here. It is our very diversity which makes the Commonwealth strong.
I also believe that it is this diversity which makes the Commonwealth so increasingly relevant in our twenty-first century world. The events of 11th September have reminded us all of the need to build bridges between different cultures based on greater knowledge and understanding of our differences. And there is another reason, closer to home.
Our own countries are rarely homogeneous. Most of us today live in societies which embrace different traditions and cultures. This is an increasingly important part of modern life, with more and easier travel the world over. National success can often be judges by the success with which we deal with differences.
It is against this background that your meeting must deal with the challenges facing this organisation. You have a number of important and immediate issues. You also have the task of defining its longer-term future, following the decision at Durban three years ago to set in train the High Level Review. The Commonwealth must move with the times if it is to remain relevant to all generations.
Finally may I thank you, Mr Prime Minister, Mr Secretary-General and President Mbeki for you kind words about my fifty years as Head of the Commonwealth. In this time I have seen this organisation grow steadily both in numbers and in significance.
I remember with much pleasure the friendships I have enjoyed with leaders from every part of the Commonwealth, some of them stretching over many years. I recall too the very many happy visits to your countries, and the opportunities that have given me to marvel at new developments as well as to draw inspiration from old traditions.
Great openings such as this, dinners, ceremonies and inaugurations there have been aplenty, they are important ways of celebrating progress and marking major occasions. But it is the contact with the people of your many countries which has given me particular personal satisfaction.
For it is because so many people from every walk of life value this extraordinary community of ours, whether through shared development projects, or professional Commonwealth associations, or distance learning drawing on our common English language, or tourism, or our sporting links such as the Commonwealth Games later this year, that the Commonwealth has such a deep meaning for me. It brings people together and enriches lives.
As long as we never lose sight of the goal, I am as sure of the future as I am proud of the past of this great organisation which it has been my privilege to serve since 1952.
It is also my pleasure to be here today for the opening of this first Heads of Government meeting of the twenty-first century. I wish you every success with your deliberations.


Tena koutou katoa. Please accept my greetings.
Thank you for your kind words of welcome.
I am delighted to be back here, to mark fifty years in the life of this country, and fifty years as Queen of New Zealand. Whenever Prince Philip and I are here we particularly appreciate the warmth and friendliness of New Zealanders, the diverse culture and the stunning beauty of the country, and the opportunity to share your special way of life.
I have vivid memories of our very first visit here, from arriving on a misty morning in Auckland harbour in December 1953, to our departure from Bluff at the end of January 1954.
We travelled extensively, both by train and by car, throughout the North and South Islands. I still recall the Maori reception in Rotorua, and, with great sadness, the terrible tragedy at Tangiwai.
Those are strong memories of the past. But I am confident that this visit will allow me to retain a real sense of the present. Throughout the world New Zealand is known by the outstanding achievements of its people.
From such a small population has emerged a remarkably large number of leaders in their field. Creative artists, film makers, scientists, mountaineers, innovators and sportspeople are world-renowned.
The source of so much talent is that rich mix of culture which is quintessential New Zealand. Your communities, old and new, are exceptionally strong. Over the last fifty years I have had the privilege to meet with Maori, the tangata whenua.
This morning in the South Island, in Christchurch, I visited Ngai Tahu. We discussed the way in which their traditional strengths can combine with the opportunities of the 21st century. I know the special place which the Maori have in this country. Their contribution to this nation's story has profoundly shaped who you have become. The creative talent and vibrancy here has also been enriched by the contribution of more recent migrants from the Pacific, Asia, and further afield.
With this strong cultural blend it is not surprising that New Zealand plays an active and significant role on the world stage. This country has a distinguished record of supporting international peacekeeping. The New Zealand presence in East Timor and the deployment of New Zealand support personnel in Afghanistan is further evidence of your willingness to engage with others in bringing stability to troubled areas.
Closer to home, New Zealand is committed to a strong partnership with the neighbours of the Pacific, your near neighbours, and you make a major contribution to the promotion of stability, peace and prosperity in the region. New Zealanders are also in key positions in the World Trade Organisation, the Commonwealth Secretariat, and also now the Commonwealth Parliamentary Association. If we contemplate this for a moment, it adds up to an extraordinary record for a country of fewer than four million people.
I hope that this Golden Jubilee year will be used as an occasion to reflect on our lives, and the broader lives of our nations, to take stock of the present and look towards the future.
This is a very different country from the one I first visited all those years ago. The changes here over these fifty years have been dramatic, I have admired your increasing energy and confidence. I know that this process of evolution will continue as you, the people of New Zealand, map out your path for the future in your own time and in your own way.
But there are also constants in the midst of that change, and they derive from the enduring values which seem to characterise New Zealanders, a sense of fairness and justice, a willingness to be outward-looking, a natural compassion for others, and above all an individuality of approach, which somehow has a very powerful connection with the rich diversity of this beautiful land. These remain, in 2002, essential to the Kiwi character.
These values also explain why it is both a privilege and a pleasure to have served as Queen of New Zealand for these fifty years. I thank you all for the loyalty and support you have given to me throughout this time.
I look forward to continuing to serve to the best of my ability in the years to come. It fills me with great pride to stand before you here today to express my lasting respect and deep affection for this country and for New Zealanders everywhere.
Kia ora mai tatou.  Greetings and thank you.


Madam President, Madam Speaker,
I thank you on behalf of Prince Philip and myself for your kind words of welcome. We are both delighted to be back here on this our sixth visit to Jamaica.
It is a very special pleasure for me, on the occasion of my Golden Jubilee, to address the Jamaican Parliament, the first of the independent Parliaments in the Caribbean.
As Jamaica prepares this year to mark the fortieth anniversary of Independence, it is fitting to reflect both on your contribution during these past years to the strengthening of the Commonwealth and on your potential in the years ahead for further growth and influence within the organisation.
Fifty years ago, the world was indeed a very different place. It is a cause for celebration that during the second half of the last century, in so many countries across the world, people have reaped the benefits of increased national consciousness and self-determination.
As sovereign states you have not only taken responsibility for your own national progress but have become ever more conscious of your collective responsibility for the sustainability and development of our planet.
For with independence has come interdependence. The terrible events of September 11th last year reminded us with tragic forcefulness that we do not exist simply as individual countries or even as large international political alliances.
We are more than ever part of a global network and the impact of international events in our modern world on any one of us is to a greater or lesser extent felt by all of us.
I am convinced that, as we face the challenges of today, in particular on the economic and social fronts, the Commonwealth remains one of the strongest pillars for the building of world-wide peace, growth and development. We pride ourselves on our acceptance of the rule of law, our preference for diplomatic solutions to international problems and our willingness to support one another in our respective development strategies.
This Parliament has been one of the significant institutions for the fashioning and strengthening of your democratic society. It has created many important laws to protect the rights of citizens and to promote Jamaica's effective participation in the global economy through international trade.
In recent years you have opened up your deliberations to make your procedures more accessible to the public. It is also encouraging that the government has sought to engage civil society more actively in the process of governance.
The warmth of the people of Jamaica has always been much in evidence during our visits here. It is the same generosity of the Jamaican spirit which provides you as Parliament and Government with the energy and the will to serve and to lead.
And I believe that this country can be justly proud of the outstanding contribution you have made to so many areas of international life. In the fields of scholarship, music and the arts, in the world of sports and in the arena of international political dialogue, Jamaicans have continually excelled over many years.
It is right to protect this heritage which has served you so well and which has allowed the talents and creative energies of Jamaicans to blossom and flourish. It is equally important to seek out new ways of drawing in all members of the society to ensure that every Jamaican enjoys equal opportunities for the fulfilment of their dreams and aspirations.
I commend you for the initiatives you are taking to support the family, protect the young and strengthen the social fabric of this country.
Prince Philip and I have a unique opportunity to see and hear about these ways in which you are meeting the challenge of giving every Jamaican a stake in the future during our short visit in this year which marks both Jamaica's fortieth anniversary of Independence and my Golden Jubilee. Such anniversaries are important.
They are, I hope, opportunities to celebrate and, in so doing, to bring people and communities together. They are also moments to reflect on what has gone before and to rededicate ourselves with determination and confidence to all that lies ahead.
Above all they are occasions to remind ourselves of the honour, the pride and the pleasure of giving service to this country and Jamaicans everywhere.
I wish you well as you face the challenges of the present and the future and I pray God's blessings upon you all as you seek to build a brighter tomorrow.



Members of the National Assembly for Wales, it is my pleasure to address you on the last day of what has been a wonderful tour of Wales. The Duke of Edinburgh and I have greatly appreciated the warmth of the welcome which we have received in the places we have visited, small and large, from Bangor to Newport.
Here in Cardiff Bay, we can see around us changes which have shaped the history of Wales. A thousand years ago, this was a piece of marsh ground forming part of the disputed kingdom of Glamorgan, ruled over by descendants of Rhodri the Great, whose blood line runs through my family.
One hundred years ago, in the first year of my great grandfather's reign, this site was part of one of the busiest ports in the world, exporting almost 19 million tons of coal from the thriving pits of South Wales.
When I came to the throne, Cardiff's port had already begun to change. The rise and fall of businesses due to the vagaries of supply and demand, and to changes in the use of raw materials or in technology, are never easy.
But Wales is overcoming its difficulties. Over the last decade, a new life has been breathed into this area. Hotels, marinas, exhibition centres, restaurants and residential and commercial properties have replaced the docks of the past.
Opposite this Assembly Building, the spectacular new Wales Millennium Centre, which will be a base for Welsh National Opera and other important cultural institutions, is being built where railway lines once ran.
The growth and innovation in Cardiff Bay can be seen across Wales. More than 70 thousand people are now employed by overseas companies you have been able to attract here.
In this Chamber, you are yourselves building a new institution, and you are an important element in the evolving constitutions of this country. This can be seen in the context of steady changes in the way Wales has been governed over the last 50 years.
Throughout the second part of the twentieth century there had been a growing level of administrative devolution to Wales. The significance of the change which occurred in 1998 was that administrative devolution was replaced by a system which was to be more accountable to the electorate. It is an example of how our system of government can adjust to new demands peacefully and democratically.
I am not sure what Rhodri the Great, or indeed King Edward VII, would have made of this Assembly, or of Wales at the beginning of the twenty-first century. But as Queen of the United Kingdom, I follow with great interest the work of the Parliaments and Assemblies which we now have. I hope and pray that you, as Members of the National Assembly for Wales, will continue to work together to serve the common good and the people of this proud and beautiful land.



In 2002 The Queen's Golden Jubilee was marked by a summer of celebrations, with the highpoint a long weekend of festivities in early June. During a lunch at Guildhall, London, on 4 June 2002, The Queen made a speech in which she thanked the nation for their support throughout her reign.
My Lord Mayor, Mr. Prime Minister, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you, my Lord Mayor, for your invitation to lunch at Guildhall today. It is a great pleasure once again for Prince Philip and me to be in this historic building to add another anniversary celebration to its long record of national events.
I am more than conscious at the moment of the importance of football. Although this weekend comes about half way through my Jubilee year, as far as we are concerned, it bears no relation to a rest at half-time
However, I am very glad that the fiftieth anniversary of my accession is giving so many people all over this country and in the Commonwealth an excuse to celebrate and enjoy themselves.
It has been a pretty remarkable fifty years by any standards. There have been ups and downs, but anyone who can remember what things were like after those six long years of war, appreciates what immense changes have been achieved since then.
Not everyone has been able to benefit from the growth of wealth and prosperity but it has not been for lack of political will. I think we can look back with measured pride on the history of the last fifty years.
Since the spring of this year I have travelled extensively in this country and in the Commonwealth. It has been wonderful to experience the many special events which have brought together volunteers of all ages and organisations of all kinds.
At every stage along the way, Prince Philip and I have been overwhelmed by the crowds waiting for us and deeply moved by the warmth of their welcome. We are both much looking forward to our visits to Wales next week, then to the other regions of England and in the autumn to Canada.
I am quite convinced that these local celebrations have helped to remind people of the value of such neighbourhood events in building a genuine community spirit.
I have seen this for myself in Green Street, for instance, here in the east of London, in St. Anne's Cathedral in Belfast and at that gathering of the young people of Berkshire at Bisham Abbey.
I hope that these celebrations will remind us of our shared heritage and what it means to be a united people, enjoying the support of families, friends and neighbours around us.
I take this opportunity to mention the strength I draw from my own family. The Duke of Edinburgh has made an invaluable contribution to my life over these past fifty years, as he has to so many charities and organisations with which he has been involved.
We both have a special place in our hearts for our children. I want to express my admiration for The Prince of Wales and for all he has achieved for this country. Our children, and all my family, have given me such love and unstinting help over the years, and especially in recent months.
Your hospitality at this event, my Lord Mayor, is typical of the spirit of this Jubilee and the kindness shown to me by so many people over the years. I would like to give my heartfelt thanks to each and every one of you, here in Guildhall, those of you waiting in the Mall and the streets of London, and all those up and down this country and throughout the Commonwealth, who may be watching this on television. Thank you all for your enthusiasm to mark and celebrate these past fifty years.
Gratitude, respect and pride, these words sum up how I feel about the people of this country and the Commonwealth, and what this Golden Jubilee means to me.



My Lords and Members of the House of Commons,
You do Prince Philip and me a great honour in inviting us here today. I am most grateful to have this opportunity to reply to your Loyal Addresses and I thank you both, Lord Chancellor and Mr. Speaker, for your generous words.
It is right that the first major event to mark my Golden Jubilee this summer is here in the Palace of Westminster. I would like to pay tribute to the work you do in this, the Mother of Parliaments, where you, like so many famous predecessors before you, have assembled to confront the issues of the day, to challenge each other and address differences through debate and discussion, and to play your essential part in guiding this Kingdom through the changing times of the past fifty years.
For if a Jubilee becomes a moment to define an age, then for me we must speak of change, its breadth and accelerating pace over these years. Since 1952 I have witnessed the transformation of the international landscape through which this country must chart its course, the emergence of the Commonwealth, the growth of the European Union, the end of the Cold War, and now the dark threat of international terrorism.
This has been matched by no less rapid developments at home, in the devolved shape of our nation, in the structure of society, in technology and communications, in our work and in the way we live. Change has become a constant, managing it has become an expanding discipline. The way we embrace it defines our future.
It seems to me that this country has advantages to exploit in this exciting challenge. We in these islands have the benefit of a long and proud history. This not only gives us a trusted framework of stability and continuity to ease the process of change, but it also tells us what is of lasting value. Only the passage of time can filter out the ephemeral from the enduring.
And what endure are the characteristics that mark our identity as a nation and the timeless values that guide us. These values find expression in our national institutions, including the Monarchy and Parliament, institutions which in turn must continue to evolve if they are to provide effective beacons of trust and unity to succeeding generations.
I believe that many of the traditional values etched across our history equip us well for this age of change. We are a moderate, pragmatic people, more comfortable with practice than theory. With an off-shore, seafaring tradition we are outward-looking and open-minded, well suited by temperament, and language, to our shrinking world.
We are inventive and creative, think of the record of British inventions over the past fifty years or our present thriving arts scene. We also take pride in our tradition of fairness and tolerance, the consolidation of our richly multicultural and multifaith society, a major development since 1952, is being achieved remarkably peacefully and with much goodwill.
But there is another tradition in this country which gives me confidence for the future. That is the tradition of service. The willingness to honour one another and seek the common good transcends social change. Over these fifty years on visits up and down this country I have seen at first hand and met so many people who are dedicating themselves quietly and selflessly to the service of others.
I would particularly pay tribute to the young men and women of our armed forces who give such professional service to this country often in most demanding and dangerous circumstances. They have my respect and admiration.
I also wish to express my gratitude for the work of those in the public service more widely, here in Westminster or the corridors of Whitehall and town halls, as well as in our hospitals and schools, in the police and emergency services.
But I would especially like to thank those very many people who give their time voluntarily to help others. I am pleased that the Jubilee is to be marked by the introduction of The Queen's Golden Jubilee Award, a new annual award for voluntary service by groups in the community. I hope this will give added recognition to those whose generosity of time and energy in the service of others is such a remarkable tradition in our society.
These enduring British traditions and values, moderation, openness, tolerance, service, have stood the test of time, and I am convinced they will stand us in good stead in the future. I hope that the Golden Jubilee will be an opportunity to recognise these values and to celebrate all that we as a nation have achieved since 1952.
For my part, as I travel the length and breadth of these islands over these coming weeks, I would like to thank people everywhere for the loyalty, support, and inspiration you have given me over these fifty, unforgettable years. I would like to express my pride in our past and my confidence in our future. I would like above all to declare my resolve to continue, with the support of my family, to serve the people of this great nation of ours to the best of my ability through the changing times ahead



Ever since my beloved mother died over a week ago I have been deeply moved by the outpouring of affection which has accompanied her death.
My family and I always knew what she meant for the people of this country and the special place she occupied in the hearts of so many here, in the Commonwealth and in other parts of the world. But the extent of the tribute that huge numbers of you have paid my mother in the last few days has been overwhelming. I have drawn great comfort from so many individual acts of kindness and respect.
Over the years I have met many people who have had to cope with family loss, sometimes in the most tragic of circumstances. So I count myself fortunate that my mother was blessed with a long and happy life. She had an infectious zest for living, and this remained with her until the very end. I know too that her faith was always a great strength to her.
At the ceremony tomorrow I hope that sadness will blend with a wider sense of thanksgiving, not just for her life but for the times in which she lived, a century for this country and the Commonwealth not without its trials and sorrows, but also one of extraordinary progress, full of examples of courage and service as well as fun and laughter.
This is what my mother would have understood, because it was the warmth and affection of people everywhere which inspired her resolve, dedication and enthusiasm for life.
I thank you for the support you are giving me and my family as we come to terms with her death and the void she has left in our midst. I thank you also from my heart for the love you gave her during her life and the honour you now give her in death.
May God bless you all. 



Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you for inviting Prince Philip and me to the National Space Centre today. It is a pleasure, as part of my penultimate regional tour of this Golden Jubilee, to be in the East Midlands, and to meet so many people from Leicestershire's varied communities, both urban and rural.
I offer a special welcome to Dr. Piers Sellers, who joins us from NASA by video link. He is making his final preparations to be the next British astronaut to visit the International Space Station later this year. I wish him, and all his colleagues, every success in their mission.
I am also pleased that preparations for the Beagle 2 mission to Mars are well underway and that its operations once landed will be commanded from Leicester. Over this Jubilee summer I have travelled widely, but I hope I will be forgiven for having limited my tour to the earth's surface.
Last year I visited Northamptonshire and Rutland, and now over these two days I am completing visits to the East Midlands by being in Lincolnshire, Nottinghamshire, Leicestershire, and later today Derbyshire. Each part of the East Midlands has its own identity.
But all counties have suffered as a result of the difficulties faced by rural communities. And the coalfields have long been a source of employment across the region. With their decline the energies of many people have been directed to regeneration, through alternative industries and improved environments.
As people adapt to changes like this, I would like to pay a tribute to those who work in communities on a voluntary basis to help one another. I hope that one of the lasting legacies of this summer's celebrations will have been the establishment of the Golden Jubilee Award for Voluntary Service.
Here in Leicester, at that community level, you have a reputation for successful cultural integration, producing a distinctive city renowned for its festivals and carnivals, as well as its thriving businesses. All faith communities are part of what it is to be British in 2002.
So thank you all for your welcome, I am delighted to be able to be here today, Prince Philip and I express our gratitude to all of you, across the region, for your loyal support over so many years



It gives me great pleasure to open Millennium Point today. On my visits to the West Midlands I am always struck by the vitality of the traditions of invention and industriousness.
Of course you are celebrating history here, right down to the nuts and bolts. This region was central to Britain's industrial revolution. Queen Victoria, when she was a young princess, wrote a vivid passage in her diary the first time that she saw the buildings and landscapes of the West Midlands which bore the marks of coal and steam.
That was in 1832. But as you move on, you use pride in your heritage to embrace change. There is the National Exhibition Centre, the National Indoor Arena, a world-famous symphony orchestra, and you have built your own strong links to the markets of continental Europe and to the wider world.
Vigorous change is neither confined to Birmingham nor to cities alone. Financial and service industries are now among the most important economic activities in the West Midlands as a whole, and the countryside makes a significant contribution to the economy here in this heart of England.
During this week's visit Prince Philip and I are seeing something of the diversity of this region, although of course there are many areas it was not possible to fit in this time. Today we have seen the regenerated centre of Solihull, and this building is another example of imaginative renewal of an urban environment.
Tomorrow, in contrast, we will visit the Royal Show, which is the largest outdoor rural business event of its kind in the world. Prince Philip will also sample what can safely be described as a distinctive flavour of the region at the Marmite factory which is celebrating its centenary.
Ladies and gentlemen, I have no doubt that you will use this building to inspire the next generation who will shape the technology and industry of tomorrow. And as they do so they take their place in the long, proud tradition of the West Midlands.




Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen,
It gives me great pleasure to welcome you and Mrs. Bush to London. Visits by American Presidents have been memorable landmarks in my reign. Unlike in the United States, the British Head of State is not limited to two terms of four years, and I have welcomed no fewer than seven of your predecessors.
The first US President to stay in Buckingham Palace was Woodrow Wilson, in December 1918. America had then been fighting alongside us in the First World War and was to do so again in our hour of need during the Second World War.
And at the very core of the new international and multilateral order which emerged after the shared sacrifices of that last, terrible World War was a vital, dynamic transatlantic partnership, working with other allies to create effective international institutions. The Marshall Plan led to the beginnings of the European Union, and the establishment of NATO became the bedrock for European security.
Sixty years ago, Winston Churchill coined the term Special Relationship to describe the close collaboration between the United Kingdom and United States forces that was instrumental in freeing Europe from tyranny. Despite occasional criticism of the term, I believe it admirably describes our friendship.
Like all special friends, we can talk frankly and we can disagree from time to time, even sometimes fall out over a particular issue. But the depth and breadth of our partnership means that there is always so much we are doing together, at all levels, that disputes can be quickly overcome and forgiven.
I in my turn have had the pleasure of paying three State Visits to your country. The last was in 1991, the end of the Cold War. Your father, Mr. President, was instrumental in leading the way through those heady but uncertain months from the fall of the Berlin Wall in 1989 to the break-up of the Soviet Union two years later.
In this twenty-first century we face together many unforeseen and formidable challenges. The leadership you showed in the aftermath of the terrible events of 11th September 2001 won the admiration of everyone in the United Kingdom. You led the response to an unprovoked terrorist attack which was on a scale never seen before.
Your friends in this country were amongst the very first to sense the grief and horror that struck your nation that day, and to share the slow and often painful process of recovery. And our troops have served side by side in Afghanistan and Iraq to lead the fight to restore freedom and democracy. Our two countries stand firm in their determination to defeat terrorism.
As we look to the future together, there are many fields in which our governments and people work alongside each other to the benefit of both nations. The end of supersonic travel by Concorde may mean that for some it takes longer to cross the Atlantic, but in the case of the United States and the United Kingdom, the two sides of the ocean have never been closer.
Our two countries are each other's largest foreign investors, supporting millions of jobs. In areas such as science and technology, health, urban redevelopment and law and order, our experts exchange best practice knowledge to improve the quality of life for us and for future generations.
All this is founded on our longstanding sense of common purpose, our shared values and shared interests, our deep underlying sense of respect and affection. We are bound across the generations by much more too. We share the confidence, and the courage, to try and make this a more prosperous, a safer, and above all a freer world. The reason for this, Mr. President, is written in our history. As your father said in his own inaugural address We know what is right, freedom is right.
So Ladies and Gentlemen, I ask you to raise your glasses to President and Mrs. Bush, to the continued friendship between our two nations, and to the health, prosperity and happiness of the people of the United States.



Prime Minister, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Twice within the span of a single generation, Australia and Britain stood side by side in two of the bloodiest wars in human history. The struggle was bitter, but by sheer persistence and dogged courage, the forces of aggression and tyranny were defeated. But the cost in human lives and misery was enormous.
That is why I am so pleased to join the Prime Minister of Australia in unveiling this magnificent memorial to the hundreds and thousands of Australians who fought and gave their lives in battles at sea, on land and in the air wherever the enemy was to be found.
A full record of their service and sacrifice is inscribed on this Memorial. It will stand as a permanent tribute to their partnership and sacrifice in a common cause. All who pass it will be reminded of the immense contribution made by Australians to final victory.
I hope it will also remind future generations of Australians, who come to visit London, that the support of their predecessors in those critical days will always be remembered here with respect and thankfulness.



Mr. Chairman, Ladies and Gentlemen,
I am delighted to launch the Women and War Exhibition which shows how important the role of women has been in time of war. Over the two World Wars and in the many conflicts since then, women in Britain and throughout the Commonwealth have faced and overcome all manner of challenges.
From my experience as a 2nd Subaltern in the ATS I began to understand the esprit de corps that flourishes in the face of adversity and forges friendships which last a lifetime.
Throughout my reign I have watched with admiration how women in the three Services and many related organisations have taken on wider responsibilities and ever more demanding roles on land, on sea and in the air.
This exhibition is a tribute to their spirit and to that vital contribution made by women in the past, present and, I am certain, in the challenging future which lies ahead.
I believe that Women and War will generate great interest both in the United Kingdom and abroad. I am pleased to declare the exhibition open.



Colonel Massey, Officers, Warrant Officers, Non-Commissioned Officers and Troopers of the Household Cavalry.
This is always a special moment for me. It is the sixth time I have presented new standards to the Household Cavalry and I take great pride in the service you have given during the last fifty years, as your predecessors have given to Sovereigns since the Restoration. This parade gives me the opportunity to express my gratitude to you and to congratulate you on the excellence of today's ceremonial.
This occasion enables me to express my great admiration for the courage, professionalism and distinction of all our servicemen and women engaged so successfully in the recent and continuing operations in Iraq. We as a nation are intensely proud of our armed forces and never more so than in recent weeks.
Today, at this parade, I mention especially those of D Squadron, The Blues and Royals, some of whom have very recently returned from Iraq and are with us today. I also express again my condolences to the families and friends of those who lost their lives. Their memory will never be forgotten.
The Household Cavalry's deployment in Iraq follows a whole range of operational commitments in recent years. Squadrons and individuals from both Regiments have served at the forefront of the Army's involvement in Bosnia, Kosovo and Macedonia, as well as Sierra Leone and Afghanistan.  These operations are the latest in the long histories of your regiments, represented by the battle honours won by your predecessors, and emblazoned on your Standards and Guidon which I present today.
These recent commitments and past battle honours remind us all of your prowess as fighting soldiers, but you are also known the world over for your ceremonial duties. Ten years ago I expressed my wish that my two Regiments of Household Cavalry should maintain their traditional and separate identities. I am pleased to see that you have managed to do this despite the difficulties this has posed.
I have no doubt that the future will present you and your successors with new challenges to test your courage and determination. I know too that you will be equal to them. As your Colonel-in-Chief I commend these new Standards and Guidon to your safe-keeping as an inspiration to all of you in the service of our country.



Ladies and Gentlemen,
I am very pleased to be here with you to celebrate the sixtieth anniversary of the D-Day Landings. It is a celebration of one of the most significant military successes of the Second World War, but it is also a commemoration of the sacrifices of so many of your comrades.
The Commonwealth War Graves Commission looks after the graves of more than twenty-two thousand Commonwealth Servicemen who died fighting in Normandy. Many more were wounded. Their sacrifice must never be forgotten.
This audience knows of the historic significance of what took place here sixty years ago, the sheer size and scope of the operation, it included the largest massed airborne landing yet attempted anywhere and successfully made, the boldness and imagination of the concept, the months of painstaking planning, the endless training and waiting, and then the ferocity of the day itself and the campaign that followed.
None of this meticulous preparation would have achieved anything without the courage and fortitude, and the dogged determination, of the hundreds of thousands of Servicemen who landed on the beaches on that day, and then fought their way inland in the face of determined opposition.
After so many frustrating delays, the invasion of Europe, for which everyone in the free world had been praying, had finally started, and everyone hoped that it would lead to a speedy end to the war. My father broadcast to the nation on that day and said, Once more a supreme test has to be faced. This time the challenge is not to fight to survive, but to fight to win the final victory for the good cause.
We are all getting older, and while it is sad that this will be the final parade in Normandy of the Normandy Veterans Association, it must not be forgotten that the members of the Association continue to care for one another, to help each other in need, to support each other in loss and to keep alive the memory of all that you achieved in those crucial days. The Association can take great pride in all it has done and continues to do.
There is just one thing more I want to say. What for you is a haunting memory of danger and sacrifice one summer long ago, is for your country, and for generations of your countrymen to come, one of the proudest moments in our long national history.
I take it upon myself to express the immense debt of gratitude we owe to you all. I salute you, and thank you on behalf of our whole nation.



Messieurs les Presidents, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you for your most generous speech. I am grateful to you for this opportunity in these magnificent surroundings to meet so many members of both houses of the French Parliament, as well as some of their colleagues from both houses of the British Parliament, during this visit to mark the centenary of the Entente Cordiale.
This anniversary gives this, my fourth, State Visit to France particular significance. Looking back, it marks the anniversary of the far-sighted agreement which laid the foundation for the vital alliance of our two countries throughout the turbulence of the twentieth century. Looking forward, it gives us both an opportunity to put behind us our recent tensions to address some of the challenges and opportunities ahead.
We have both made the choice of Europe and the European Union as a principal vehicle for our economic and political aspirations. For both of us this does not, nor should not, in any way weaken our strong ties of friendship to the United States. These are complementary relationships.
More than ever we are working to make Europe's voice in the world count, and to ensure that Europe's diplomacy can be backed up by military credibility where necessary and where NATO are not engaged. In a dangerous world our two nations have so much to offer when we use our strengths together, our diplomacy, our military capability, our common permanent membership of the Security Council, our positions at the heart of La Francophonie and the Commonwealth. Let us move on from our recent differences as our forbears did a hundred years ago.
As we all know governments can only do so much. This is where our parliaments and our people can also guide us. Our mutual attachment to parliamentary democracy is the foundation of our common freedom and values.
Democracy is the most precious gift we have and we can never take it for granted. Links between our two parliaments have long existed but have not been as broadly based or as deep as either side would like. National parliaments continue to have a huge role to play not only within our own countries but also in the development of the European Union of the future.
Our two peoples are perhaps showing the way. We know each other better and better, as we visit each other more often, work together more effectively, settle in each other's countries, and enrich our two cultures whether it be in music or art, fashion or sport. It is at this all-important popular level that so much has been going on in recent years. Parliaments can not only follow these developments more closely, but can also lead them too. I hope the Entente Cordiale centenary will contribute to this.
Messieurs les Presidents, thank you again for this magnificent reception and for the warmth of your hospitality. May I conclude by asking all present to join me in a toast to the Parliaments of France and the United Kingdom, and to the Entente Cordiale.



I am delighted to welcome you and Signora Ciampi to London today. Prince Philip and I recall with great pleasure the warmth of your hospitality and that of the Italian people during our three State Visits to Italy, the last in October 2000.
Our two nations bear the stamp of more than two thousand years of shared history. The greatest British writers, from Chaucer and Milton to Keats, Byron and Shelley, have drawn inspiration from the Italian literature and culture which has done so much to shape our civilisation. Millions of British schoolchildren first encounter your country through the settings and stories of Shakespeare's plays. Robert Browning memorably wrote that if you opened his heart, you would find Italy graved inside of it.
We in Britain today are enthusiastic admirers of Italian culture, Italian fashion and Italian food. Our opera houses have been blessed with productions by Franco Zeffirelli, our football grounds with the talents of so many gifted Italian footballers.
Looking towards your own country, we take pride in the role British citizens have played in international efforts to save Venice, and in the generations of British archaeologists who have helped to unlock the secrets of ancient Rome. Contemporary British architecture, music and design is I believe more popular in Italy than ever before. The British Council this year celebrates sixty years of continuous presence in Italy, with a programme of events including a major art exhibition and visits to Italy by some of our best writers, musicians and scientists.
As two of the world's leading economies, the United Kingdom and Italy are working together to enhance global prosperity and to ensure that its benefits are shared.
Here too we have a long common history. Lombard Street, in the City of London, testifies to the fact that it was Italian bankers in the Middle Ages who brought modern finance to this island.
Today, British companies working in Italy manufacture everything from clothes to pharmaceuticals to ice cream, while Italian companies here produce everything from helicopters to kitchen appliances. Our investment and trade creates and sustains thousands of jobs in both our countries.
We are close partners and leading nations in the European Union. The modern European Union was born in Italy, first at the Messina conference, then at the first Treaty of Rome in 1957. The EU Constitutional Treaty, signed in Rome last year, is a sign of our shared commitment to Europe's future.
We are close allies in the North Atlantic Treaty Organisation, the United Nations and the G8. And it is a characteristic of our alliance, and of our friendship, that we stand together in troubled times.
Giuseppe Mazzini, one of the architects of modern Italy, whose 200th anniversary we celebrate this year, found safety in London from persecution. I can never forget the many young British soldiers who died in the Second World War fighting to liberate Italy from tyranny, a fight in which you, Mr. President, played a distinguished part.
Today, British and Italian armed forces are working side by side in a shared commitment to bring peace and stability to the Balkans, Afghanistan, and Iraq. We salute those of your countrymen who have given their lives in these conflicts and we particularly share your sadness at your recent loss.
Mr. President, our countries histories, and our futures, are intimately linked. Ours is an old friendship, but it has lost none of the admiration and indeed the passion which have marked it down the centuries. Your State Visit today symbolises a relationship between the United Kingdom and Italy which has never been stronger. We can look back together with pride, and we look forward together with optimism for the future.
Ladies and Gentlemen, I ask you all to raise your glasses to,
The President and Signora Ciampi, and the People of the Italian Republic.



Co-Chancellors, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you for inviting me here today. My family has enjoyed a long association with two institutions that have come together to create this powerful new force in higher education.
The Victoria University of Manchester was, of course, named in honour of Queen Victoria and I have visited the University on a number of occasions over the past fifty years in my role as Visitor. My most recent visit was two years ago when I was able to see for myself the magnificent contribution that the two universities made to the very successful Commonwealth Games hosted by the city in 2002.
As we have heard from the President and Vice-Chancellor, the creation of the new University represents a bold and imaginative response to the challenges facing higher education.
In creating this new institution, you are building on a rich academic heritage and a fine tradition of excellence in both teaching and research. By combining the talents of two such highly rated institutions, I feel sure that you will be able to take advantage of a more powerful academic position, not only in the United Kingdom, but across the world.
I offer you, Co-Chancellors, President and Vice-Chancellor and all your staff my good wishes as you build your new institution and take advantage of the challenges and opportunities that lie ahead.
I am pleased to present this Royal Charter to mark the formal establishment of the University of Manchester.



Mr. Minister President, Mr. Speaker, Ladies and Gentlemen,
This is the last day of my visit to your country. On the first evening in Berlin I spoke of how in my lifetime I have seen the relationship between our two countries evolve from war to peace and from partnership to the enduring friendship of today.
Certainly we should not lose sight of the past, nor of the scale of human suffering on both sides during the Second World War. Nobody of my generation needs reminding of that. I know that many of you in Düsseldorf and elsewhere in Germany have had recent cause to remember. But we have travelled a very long way in the last sixty years and so much of what has been achieved has been done together.
When I first came to Düsseldorf in 1965 I was immediately struck by the warmth here for the United Kingdom and by the appreciation for how Britain had helped in the years immediately following the war. Britain established a framework of government and institutions which played an important part in re-establishing democracy. This included the state parliament, in which we find ourselves today, and the process which created the Land of North Rhine-Westphalia.
And Britain's relations with this part of Germany go back much further. I was fascinated to see in the lobby of this building a copy of the marriage document between Henry VIII and Anne of Cleves. Florence Nightingale studied here. British capital funded the coal mines which used deep-mining technology developed in Britain.
As has happened in Britain, many of those coal mines have closed as we have both adapted to globalisation, but the Rhine-Ruhr remains an economic powerhouse for Germany and Europe. I am pleased to note that some three hundred British firms have chosen this Federal State as the base for their German operations.
Equally, companies from this region have not been slow to set up shop in the United Kingdom. Some three thousand German firms have taken this step and this investment provides no fewer than three hundred and fifty thousand jobs in the United Kingdom.
Mr. Minister President, Mr. Speaker, mutual investment, scientific exchange and commercial cooperation is now so ingrained between NorthRhine-Westphalia and the United Kingdom that we must be careful not to take it for granted. This is the sure sign of the strength of our relationship.
I leave Germany this afternoon at the end of this visit with a real sense of opportunities ahead for those in both our countries who can grasp them. I depart with renewed confidence in the deep friendship between our two countries so crucial to us both in the twenty-first century ahead. I leave also grateful to you all for the warmth of the welcome I have been given everywhere.



Presiding Officer, First Minister, Members of the Scottish Parliament,
Thank you for inviting me to address you here today. As you have said, Presiding Officer, this is the place where the land of Scotland and its people come together. Building a Parliament to meet that goal, fit for the twenty-first century and beyond, has been a unique challenge.
It was Winston Churchill who commented, when the House of Commons had to be reconstructed after the Second World War, We shape our buildings, and they shape us. In Holyrood you have drawn not just on your own heritage but on the best parliamentary traditions of Westminster, the Commonwealth and Europe.
We meet in a remarkably open and transparent chamber, where this Parliament sits in the round in European fashion. The mace reminds us that your procedures follow British and Commonwealth models. The Honours of Scotland remain powerful symbols of the history and heritage which unites the communities of this land.
These communities, Scotland's people, are its enduring strength. At a time when politicians around the world wonder how to draw closer to those they represent, I was particularly moved this morning by watching all who proudly made their way down the Royal Mile, people from every walk of Scottish life.
Ladies and Gentlemen, it is the task of this Parliament to give voice to the hopes of all these people, their families and their friends. This Parliament has been shaped to invite them in, to listen to them and to speak up for them. It is now your responsibility in their service to take advantage of everything that this remarkable building has to offer, channelling aspirations, resolving conflicting views, moulding the future of Scotland.
Certainly this new parliament building has had a difficult and controversial birth. But that is all the more reason to ensure that, with the energy, flair and determination for which Scots are renowned the world over, Holyrood comes to be seen as a landmark of twenty-first century democracy, built securely on the foundations of accessibility, accountability, equality of opportunity, and partnership, setting new standards of bringing people and parliament together.
There is much in which this Parliament and Scotland's people can already take pride. Over the past five years more than a thousand parliamentarians from around the world have come to Edinburgh to see your principles being put into practice. In your procedures you are pioneering new forms of working in close association with those you represent. In doing so, you add distinctive Scottish values to the British democratic tradition.
Ladies and Gentlemen, in addressing this Parliament in the past I have spoken of my faith in your commitment to the service of the people of Scotland. It is a pleasure to renew that faith here in your new home. The Duke of Edinburgh joins me in wishing you every success in your deliberations in the years to come.



Secretary of State, Lord Spencer, Ladies and Gentlemen,
It is sometimes difficult to believe that it is now nearly seven years since we heard the news that Diana, Princess of Wales had been killed in a car crash in Paris.
Certainly the days that followed are etched on my memory as we as a family and nation came to terms with the loss, united by an extraordinary sense of shock, grief and sadness.
By any standard Diana's tragic death held the attention of the world. Central to this remains the extraordinary effect Diana had on those around her. Her drive to empathise with those in difficulty, hardship or distress, her willingness to embrace a new cause, her shrewd ability to size up all those she met, allowed her not only to touch people's lives but to change them.
This is her wider legacy. But I cannot forget, and nor can those of us here today who knew her much more personally, as sister, wife, mother, or daughter-in-law, the Diana who made such an impact on our lives. Of course there were difficult times, but memories mellow with the passing of the years. I remember especially the happiness she gave to my two grandsons.
Such memories are most people's memorials, the departed live on in those they have helped to shape in life. But for some exceptional people there is a need for something more, a permanent and more public recognition. Creating a memorial to Diana has been no easy task.
To present a likeness seemed at best unnecessary for someone whose image continues to exert such a fascination the world over. To find some other way to capture her spirit has been the challenge.
I congratulate those who have created the memorial before us. I thank both the design team for the imagination which they have brought to this project and those who have realised their concept with such care and craftsmanship.
I think Diana would have enjoyed it, and I believe she would want all of us to do so too.
Ladies and Gentlemen, on behalf of Charles, William, Harry and all my family and of all the Spencer family with us today, I have much pleasure in declaring the Diana, Princess of Wales, Memorial Fountain open.



I am delighted to have been invited to attend this very special occasion for the Royal Bank of Scotland. The Bank was granted its Royal Charter 278 years ago and even a prudent bank needs to build a new headquarters once in a while.
I can only add my congratulations to all those who have been involved in the planning, design and construction of this imaginative building. Buildings do not make businesses, but they do dictate the quality of the working environment, and I hope that everyone who will be working here will appreciate its state-of-the-art facilities.
For many years, Scotland has had an enviable reputation for efficient financial management in a highly competitive international market. This building is a fine tribute to the many generations of canny Scottish bankers, who have made, and are still making, such a valuable contribution to the national economy.
It therefore gives me the greatest pleasure to declare this new headquarters for the Royal Bank of Scotland, open.



Yesterday's bombings in London have deeply affected us all. I know I speak for everyone in expressing my sympathy to those who have been caught up in these events and above all to the relatives and friends of those who have lost their lives. My thoughts are also with the injured some of whom I have been able to see and talk to today.
I also want to thank you and all members of the emergency services and Transport for London who are working with such care, professionalism and sensitivity often in very difficult circumstances. You have the respect of all of us as you go about your business.
Finally I want to express my admiration for the people of our capital city who in the aftermath of yesterday's bombings are calmly determined to resume their normal lives.
That is the answer to this outrage. Sadly we in Britain have been all too familiar with acts of terror and members of my generation, especially at this end of London, know that we have been here before. But those who perpetrate these brutal acts against innocent people should know that they will not change our way of life.
Atrocities such as these simply reinforce our sense of community, our humanity, and our trust in the rule of law. That is the clear message from us all.



Prime Minister, Premier, Ladies and Gentlemen,
I would like to express my appreciation to you, Prime Minister, for your warm words and I would also like to thank the people of Alberta for inviting Prince Philip and me to be part of their Centenary festivities. It is a great pleasure for us both to be back here in Western Canada.
The story of Alberta mirrors in many ways the history of the country as a whole and you can be deservedly proud of the many successes of the past century. Indeed the story of Canada is not unlike the topography of Western Canada,  opportunities as vast as the seemingly endless prairies and as exciting as the rolling foothills and soaring Rockies. Yet opportunities are meaningless if not for the dreams and the drive of men and women who work to make this land a special haven like no other.
Over the past eight days, Prince Philip and I have met hundreds of such Canadians in both Alberta and Saskatchewan. We have both much enjoyed the chance to meet veterans, First Nations members, and men and women from all branches of the Canadian Forces.
We particularly appreciated the opportunity to pay tribute to the outstanding men and women of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police. We have talked to volunteers, children and working people of all ages. As in all our visits over the past 54 years, Canadians,  both young, and young at heart,  have welcomed us and have been our generous hosts.
And as in all our visits down the years, whether watching a chuck wagon race at the Calgary Stampede or athletic prowess at the Montreal Olympics, whether listening to an Inuit song of greeting in Nunavut or the skirl of pipes in Nova Scotia, I have always felt not only welcome but at home in Canada.
Of course the relationship between Crown and Canada evolves with the times, as it should. But I for one can sense the continuity, it seems to me like yesterday that small girls offered me flowers on my first visit fifty-four years ago, yet today, I suspect, it is their grandchildren who are presenting the bouquets.
Prime Minister, you have spoken of my role and that of the Crown in Canada. I would like to add that this country and Canadians everywhere have been a constant presence in my life and work, and I have so many vivid memories and a tremendous sense of pride in being part of the Canadian family. This is a relationship I have come to treasure and a country for which I have a deep and abiding affection.
As Queen of Canada, I have had the privilege of speaking to you on numerous occasions since my first visit in 1951. In doing so, I have attempted to convey the admiration and optimism I feel for this land and her diverse people.
Your enduring ties to the Crown stand not only for a respect for heritage, but also for the principles of peace, order and good government developed by the Fathers of Confederation who envisaged and worked so diligently to make this country a reality.
These nation builders entrusted these principles to us and we do well to remember this as we dedicate ourselves to building a better future for the people of this great country.
Que Dieu bénisse le Canada, May God bless Canada.



Your Excellency, Mr. Premier, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you, Mr. Premier, for your warm words of welcome. This is a very happy occasion for Prince Philip and me, rich in associations, memories and symbolism.
The first time I came here, on a glorious summer's day fifty-two years ago, there was, of course, no Opera House. The city was smaller, the skyline more modest, and this magnificent building was no more than a dream.
Ahead were decades of spectacular national growth, an immigration programme that was to change the face of Australian society and enrich the entire nation, a burgeoning of trade and cultural activity that would cement Australia's reputation as a generous and tolerant society, as a proud member of the international community and as a respected neighbour in her region.
I believe that all this is symbolised by the Opera House itself. When in October 1973 I opened this building, it was universally agreed that the Opera House was something more than a performing arts centre, more than a great work of architecture.
It was seen even then as, and has certainly since become, the symbol of the nation itself, a building to which visitors happily return again and again for renewed joy and inspiration. It is therefore most gratifying, Mr. Premier, that you have invited me to return to perform what is, in effect, my second opening ceremony.
This colonnade, and the structural modifications that go with it, is the first addition to the exterior fabric of the building since its original construction, and the first and only exterior modification to have been designed by the creator of the building, Joern Utzon.
It sets the seal on an historic partnership, one not without some strains- between the architect and the Government and people of New South Wales.
It confirms that the Opera House is not something sacred, but a living structure, a vibrant and evolving place that meets the needs of its users and reflects the wishes of the people.
It is certainly fitting that, thirty-three years after its opening, the Opera House is now being officially proposed for listing on the World Heritage register.
I congratulate all who have worked on this project and brought it to fruition, and it gives me great pleasure to declare open the new Colonnade of the Sydney Opera House.



Your Excellency, Ladies and Gentlemen,
I take great pleasure in formally welcoming you and Madam Liu to Buckingham Palace on the occasion of your State Visit to the United Kingdom. You are certainly no stranger to the United Kingdom. This will be your second visit this year, and I also met Your Excellency when you visited as Vice-President in 2001.
It is now almost twenty years since I visited China. Since then China's development has caught the world's attention and admiration. It matters to all of us what kind of country China's people will build, what role they will play in the world of the twenty-first century, and how this will be perceived by others.
China's growth brings with it difficult challenges for you and your government, but also great opportunities. During her visit in September, The Princess Royal saw both the flagship cities of Beijing and Shanghai and the efforts of government and non-governmental organisations to reduce poverty in rural areas of Anhui and Gansu. I am delighted that China was able to join discussions earlier this year on poverty relief in Africa, sharing with the global community your own remarkable experience in this area.
In those twenty years, the world has changed too. When I visited China in 1986, we had no inkling that the Cold War was so close to its end and we knew little then of the significance of global warming. Now we are able to work together and in the international community to tackle problems of environmental protection and sustainable development.
Amidst all this change one constant theme has been the steady growth in the relationship between our two countries since we first established relations in 1954. The return of Hong Kong to China in 1997 was a significant milestone. We must continue to move forward in a partnership which remains comprehensive, strategic and productive.
We have seen excellent examples of this partnership this year, in your participation at the G8 Summit at Gleneagles, and at your meeting with the Prime Minister in Beijing, marking the Thirtieth Anniversary of EU-China relations.
I am pleased that so many young Chinese choose to study and gain work experience in the United Kingdom and that more Chinese tourists are able to come to this country. The Duke of York welcomed the first tour group in July and over one thousand have arrived since then. More and more British people now work, travel and study in China, where we have a dynamic trade and investment relationship with British companies creating jobs in your country and Chinese companies doing the same here. We welcome the growing opportunities presented by the opening up of China towards a market economy.
Our growing cultural and sporting exchanges highlight the longstanding traditions of our two countries as well as their vitality and creativity. Over the next seven years, the people of our two capitals will share a unique experience, as host cities of successive Olympic Games. In science too, we have a rich tradition of co-operation. The United Kingdom was pleased to be a partner with China in the international project to sequence the human genome, a milestone of scientific development in the twenty-first century. This year we have taken our partnership in science to a new level, with a series of over sixty events across China in important fields of cooperation such as medical science and renewable energy research.
Your Excellency, this State Visit allows us to draw attention to the flourishing relationship between the United Kingdom and China and to demonstrate the importance we attach to its development. It is a relationship of great consequence to us, full of potential and rich in opportunity for the people of both our countries. There is a saying of Confucius that it is a great pleasure to welcome visitors from afar and I am pleased to be able to welcome you here tonight, I wish you and Madame Liu a most enjoyable visit to the United Kingdom.
May I now ask all our guests to raise their glasses and drink a toast ,  To His Excellency the President of the People's Republic of China and Madam Liu and the Chinese people.



It is a great pleasure to welcome King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Custodian of the Two Holy Mosques, to London once more. Your Majesty, like many of your subjects, you are no stranger to the United Kingdom. Contacts between our two families have been regular and close. I recall with pleasure our most recent time together, when I was able to introduce you to some of the delights of Scotland when you visited Balmoral in 1998.
Many British people have benefited from Saudi hospitality over the years as traders, experts and advisors. Twenty-five thousand British nationals carry out pilgrimage annually to Mecca and to Medina, and they are particularly grateful for the enormous effort that the Saudi authorities put into ensuring a safe and successful visit.
Our friendly relations go back many years. There are times when we have worked together against threats to our common security. And whilst times change, I believe that the links and knowledge, the experience and the friendships that have been built up over the last hundred years still stand us in good stead today, and will do in the future.
We have shared values that stem from two great religious traditions based on Abrahamic faiths. In a world where some people seek to exploit religion to undermine our societies, we must continue to work together to promote common values, strengthen mutual understanding, and encourage appreciation of what is best in both our cultures.
The relationship between us has grown deeper and wider as you are working to diversify Saudi Arabia's economy. The two-way exchange of trade and investment is flourishing, with this country now benefiting from inward investment from the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia, while links between our armed forces are stronger than ever.
Co-operation in education and training is expanding with the welcome help and encouragement of the British Council. We also continue to work together against the terrorists who threaten the way of life of our citizens in both countries, and in the search for a more peaceful and stable Middle East, to the benefit of all its peoples.
We have watched with great interest your work to lead the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia forward, whilst respecting its traditions and deeply held beliefs. We have appreciated and admired Saudi Arabia's role in the search for a peaceful solution to the Arab-Israeli conflict, in particular Your Majesty's own personal contribution through the Arab Peace Initiative. We will continue to support your efforts in the cause of peace in the region.
The relationship between our Two Kingdoms is one of mutual benefit, learning and understanding.
So King Abdullah, Custodian of the Two Holy Mosques, I warmly welcome you to this country.



Rector, Ladies and Gentlemen
It is a pleasure to be here today to bestow upon the College its new Charter, one hundred years after it received the original. It has been a century of great achievement, and my thanks go to all the people, the staff and the students, whose work over the decades has enabled Prince Albert's vision to flourish. You now face the future as an independent institution and, as we are seeing today, have the privilege of awarding your own degrees.
Imperial was founded with the intention that it should support British technology and industry in the face of international competition. You have certainly fulfilled that aspiration. Today you renew your mission of applying your learning, discoveries and innovation to meet the changing needs of society, industry and healthcare. You will also, of course, continue to carry out the important task of educating the young people who will become the future inventors, discoverers and leaders of business and society. By discharging this academic mission, you play a vital role in supporting this country's position on the world stage.
I warmly congratulate you on reaching this notable milestone and wish you continuing success for your next one hundred years.



Commanding Officer and members of the Honourable Artillery Company,
Since I last presented new colours to the Company in 1980, the Regiment has served with distinction on exercises and operations around the world, and most recently in the Balkans, Iraq and Afghanistan. Facilities sited in the Company's grounds also played a key role in the aftermath of the London bombings of 2005.
As Captain-General, I am pleased to know that the Honourable Artillery Company continues to uphold its traditions of service and duty while meeting the new challenges of a changing world. I acknowledge with gratitude the commitment that your Officers, Soldiers and their families make to the better defence of the Realm. I am entrusting these new colours, which chronicle so much of the Regiment's history, to your safekeeping, confident that they will continue to inspire the highest standards of the Honourable Artillery Company.



Mr. President
Thank you for your warm words. This is my fifth visit to the United States and I believe it is important to remind ourselves of the purpose of these occasions which gives meaning to the ceremonial, the symbolism and the circumstance. A State Visit provides us with a brief opportunity to step back from our current preoccupations to reflect on the very essence of our relationship. It gives us the chance to look back at how the stories of our two countries have been inextricably woven together, it is the moment to take stock of our present friendship- rightly taking pleasure from its strengths, while never taking these for granted, and it is the time to look forward, jointly renewing our commitment to a more prosperous, safer and freer world.
Last week I had the pleasure of sharing with you an extraordinary anniversary in our common history. It was a privilege to join the commemoration of the Jamestown landing by that small group of British citizens all those years ago. My two days in Virginia gave me a new insight into those events which helped to shape this country's development and to lay the foundations of this great nation based on shared principles of equality, democracy and the rule of law.
And now in Washington we have a further opportunity to acknowledge the present strength of our relationship. I shall enjoy not only renewing old acquaintances and making new ones but also recognising the breadth and depth of the friendship we have shared for so long. We can celebrate the close and enduring associations which thrive between the United States and the United Kingdom at every level, be it government or corporate, institutional or personal.
This visit also gives us a window on the future, both the future of the United States and the future cooperation between our countries. I particularly look forward in the next two days to seeing at first hand something of how the cutting edge of science and technology can take us to the next phases of discovery and exploration in human endeavour.
Mr. President, thank you for inviting Prince Philip and me to visit your country to share in the commemoration of the Jamestown anniversary, and to have this opportunity to underline the extent of our friendship, past, present and future. It is indeed a pleasure for us be here in Washington again and to be welcomed back to the White House.


I have lived long enough to know that things never remain quite the same for very long. One of the things that has not changed all that much for me is the celebration of Christmas. It remains a time when I try to put aside the anxieties of the moment and remember that Christ was born to bring peace and tolerance to a troubled world.
The birth of Jesus naturally turns our thoughts to all new-born children and what the future holds for them. The birth of a baby brings great happiness, but then the business of growing up begins. It is a process that starts within the protection and care of parents and other members of the family, including the older generation. As with any team, there is strength in combination, what grandparent has not wished for the best possible upbringing for their grandchildren or felt an enormous sense of pride at their achievements?
But the pressures of modern life sometimes seem to be weakening the links which have traditionally kept us together as families and communities. As children grow up and develop their own sense of confidence and independence in the ever-changing technological environment, there is always the danger of a real divide opening up between young and old, based on unfamiliarity, ignorance or misunderstanding.
It is worth bearing in mind that all of our faith communities encourage the bridging of that divide. The wisdom and experience of the great religions point to the need to nurture and guide the young, and to encourage respect for the elderly. Christ himself told his disciples to let the children come to him, and Saint Paul reminded parents to be gentle with their children, and children to appreciate their parents. The scriptures and traditions of the other faiths enshrine the same fundamental guidance. It is very easy to concentrate on the differences between the religious faiths and to forget what they have in common, people of different faiths are bound together by the need to help the younger generation to become considerate and active citizens.
And there is another cause for hope that we can do better in the future at bridging the generation gap. As older people remain more active for longer, the opportunities to look for new ways to bring young and old together are multiplying.
As I look back on these past twelve months, marked in particular for me by the very generous response to my eightieth birthday, I especially value the opportunities I have had to meet young people. I am impressed by their energy and vitality, and by their ambition to learn and to travel.
It makes me wonder what contribution older people can make to help them realise their ambitions. I am reminded of a lady of about my age who was asked by an earnest, little grand-daughter the other day Granny, can you remember the Stone Age? Whilst that may be going a bit far, the older generation are able to give a sense of context as well as the wisdom of experience which can be invaluable. Such advice and comfort are probably needed more often than younger people admit or older people recognise. I hope that this is something that all of us, young or old, can reflect on at this special time of year.
For Christians, Christmas marks the birth of our Saviour, but it is also a wonderful occasion to bring the generations together in a shared festival of peace, tolerance and goodwill.
I wish you all a very happy Christmas together.



One of the features of growing old is a heightened awareness of change. To remember what happened 50 years ago means that it is possible to appreciate what has changed in the meantime. It also makes you aware of what has remained constant.
In my experience, the positive value of a happy family is one of the factors of human existence that has not changed. The immediate family of grandparents, parents and children, together with their extended family, is still the core of a thriving community.
When Prince Philip and I celebrated our Diamond Wedding last month, we were much aware of the affection and support of our own family as they gathered round us for the occasion.
Now today, of course, marks the birth of Jesus Christ. Among other things, it is a reminder that it is the story of a family, but of a family in very distressed circumstances. Mary and Joseph found no room at the inn, they had to make do in a stable, and the new-born Jesus had to be laid in a manger. This was a family which had been shut out.
Perhaps it was because of this early experience that, throughout his ministry, Jesus of Nazareth reached out and made friends with people whom others ignored or despised. It was in this way that he proclaimed his belief that, in the end, we are all brothers and sisters in one human family.
The Christmas story also draws attention to all those people who are on the edge of society, people who feel cut off and disadvantaged, people who, for one reason or another, are not able to enjoy the full benefits of living in a civilised and law-abiding community. For these people the modern world can seem a distant and hostile place.
It is all too easy to turn a blind eye, to pass by on the other side, and leave it to experts and professionals. All the great religious teachings of the world press home the message that everyone has a responsibility to care for the vulnerable. Fortunately, there are many groups and individuals, often unsung and unrewarded, who are dedicated to ensuring that the outsiders are given a chance to be recognised and respected. However, each one of us can also help by offering a little time, a talent or a possession, and taking a share in the responsibility for the well-being of those who feel excluded.
And also today I want to draw attention to another group of people who deserve our thoughts this Christmas. We have all been conscious of those who have given their lives, or who have been severely wounded, while serving with the Armed Forces in Iraq and Afghanistan. The dedication of the National Armed Forces Memorial was also an occasion to remember those who have suffered while serving in these and every other place of unrest since the end of the Second World War.
For their families, Christmas will bring back sad memories, and I pray that all of you, who are missing those who are dear to you, will find strength and comfort in your families and friends.
A familiar introduction to an annual Christmas Carol Service contains the words, Because this would most rejoice his heart, let us remember, in his name, the poor and the helpless, the cold, the hungry, and the oppressed, the sick and those who mourn, the lonely and the unloved.
Wherever these words find you, and in whatever circumstances, I want to wish you all a blessed Christmas.



Prince Philip and I have greatly enjoyed meeting you all today and hearing more about the vital work you are doing to help change young lives for the better. Since the foundation of the Prince's Trust more than thirty years ago, the principle at the core of what is done here has remained unchanged, that, when trusted to take on real responsibility for themselves, sometimes for the first time, young people can develop the skills, confidence and motivation to achieve great things. As a result, many thousands of young people have been supported and equipped to overcome great challenges and disadvantages.
As we celebrate the many extraordinary achievements of the Prince's Trust today, so too I should like briefly to reflect on the role of The Prince of Wales who has given enduring inspiration to it. In public life, highlighting the success of individuals can be a hazardous and invidious occupation. But as The Prince of Wales, our son, approaches his own sixtieth birthday, may I say that we are both enormously proud to have been reminded here today of his personal contribution to this remarkable organisation.
Countless lives have been transformed by The Prince's Trust to which The Prince of Wales has brought vision and conviction. For Prince Philip and me, there can be no greater pleasure or comfort than to know that into his care are safely-entrusted the guiding principles of public service and duty to others.
I wish you all every continued success for the future.



Premier Brown,
Prince Philip and I are delighted to have returned to Bermuda to join you in your celebrations of the 400th anniversary of settlement. My first visit to these islands was exactly 56 years ago to the very day and was a memorable part of my first Commonwealth tour.
In 1609 the storm-lashed crew and passengers from the shipwrecked Sea Venture could not possibly have imagined the future Bermuda. Their preoccupation was with finding a way to continue to the relatively harsh conditions of Virginia where supplies and people were desperately needed.
No-one could have anticipated how Bermudians would repeatedly and successfully reinvent themselves over the following 400 years. In that time, Bermudians excelled among other things as tobacco farmers, traders in salt, privateers and builders of fast schooners. That shipbuilding skill was in evidence today when we met some of those dockyard apprentices who, having received some of their training in the United Kingdom, are working on The Spirit of Bermuda.
Bermudians can also be proud of their enterprise, whether selling onions and Easter lilies to New York or promoting subtropical tourism, which was known to my grandfather in his days as a naval cadet.
Tourism in this mild climate and so close to North America remains a vital part of your economic life. More recently, Bermuda has been a successful pioneer of the highly-specialized reinsurance business. Indeed, in spite of the challenges of the global economy, modern Bermuda has made a great success of these two most competitive industries, relying on some very special attributes.
On my second visit here in 1975, the Premier, Sir Edward Richards, memorably described Bermuda as having two principal resources, A land fetching and beautiful, which we must keep fetching and beautiful, a people renowned for their friendliness and courtesy whom we must keep friendly and courteous. On another occasion, Dame Lois Browne-Evans said, Our Bermuda people exercise good common sense of which we have an abundance.
Just as Admiral Somers would have struggled to predict the future in 1609, so it would be unwise to predict where Bermuda's natural beauty, friendliness, courtesy and commonsense will lead it next. But one thing is certain, the United Kingdom will continue to follow and support Bermuda's progress to the very best of her ability. After 400 years of common experience, we can be confident in placing our faith in Bermuda's future, whatever it may hold.
Ladies and gentlemen, I would ask you to rise and drink a toast to, Bermuda.



This year the Commonwealth commemorates its foundation sixty years ago. The London Declaration of 1949 was the start of a new era in which our member countries committed themselves to work together, in partnership and as equals, towards a shared future.
We can rightly celebrate the fact that the founding members vision of the future has become a reality. The Commonwealth has evolved out of all recognition from its beginning. It has helped give birth to modern nations, and the eight original countries have become fifty-three. We are now home to nearly two billion people, a third of the world's population. Across continents and oceans, we have come to represent all the rich diversity of humankind.
Yet despite its size and scale, the Commonwealth to me has been sustained during all this change by the continuity of our mutual values and goals. Our beliefs in freedom, democracy and human rights, development and prosperity mean as much today as they did more than half a century ago.
These values come from a common responsibility exercised by our governments and peoples. It is this which makes the Commonwealth a family of nations and peoples, at ease with being together. As a result, I believe we are inspired to do our best to meet people's most pressing needs, and to develop a truly global perspective. That is why the modern Commonwealth has stood the test of time.
But as we reflect upon our long association, we should recognise the challenges that lie ahead. Nearly one billion people of today's Commonwealth are under 25 years of age. These are the people that this association must continue to serve in the future. It is they who can help shape the Commonwealth of today, and whose children will inherit the Commonwealth of tomorrow.
To help them make the best of their opportunities, our young men and women therefore need the opportunity to become active and responsible members of the communities in which they live. I am pleased that the Commonwealth recognises this, and is determined to continue to put young people at its centre.
The call that brought the Commonwealth together in 1949 remains the same today. Then we joined together in a collective spirit, built on lasting principles, wisdom, energy and creativity, to meet the great tasks of our times. As the Commonwealth celebrates its sixtieth birthday, its governments, communities and we as individuals should welcome that achievement. Together, we should continue to work hard to deal with today's challenges so that the young people of today's Commonwealth can realise their aspirations. In that way, we can look to the future with confidence.



Mr President, Secretary-General, Members of the General Assembly,
I believe I was last here in 1957.
Since then, I have travelled widely and met many leaders, ambassadors and statesmen from around the world. I address you today as Queen of sixteen United Nations Member States and as Head of the Commonwealth of 54 countries.
I have also witnessed great change, much of it for the better, particularly in science and technology, and in social attitudes. Remarkably, many of these sweeping advances have come about not because of governments, committee resolutions, or central directives, although all these have played a part, but instead because millions of people around the world have wanted them.
For the United Nations, these subtle yet significant changes in people's approach to leadership and power might have foreshadowed failure and demise. Instead, the United Nations has grown and prospered by responding and adapting to these shifts.
But also, many important things have not changed. The aims and values which inspired the United Nations Charter endure, to promote international peace, security and justice, to relieve and remove the blight of hunger, poverty and disease, and to protect the rights and liberties of every citizen.
The achievements of the United Nations are remarkable. When I was first here, there were just three United Nations operations overseas. Now over 120,000 men and women are deployed in 26 missions across the world. You have helped to reduce conflict, you have offered humanitarian assistance to millions of people affected by natural disasters and other emergencies, and you have been deeply committed to tackling the effects of poverty in many parts of the world.
But so much remains to be done. Former Secretary-General Dag Hammarskjold once said that constant attention by a good nurse may be just as important as a major operation by a surgeon. Good nurses get better with practice, sadly the supply of patients never ceases.
This September, leaders will meet to agree how to achieve the Millennium Development Goals when each nation will have its own distinctive contribution to make. New challenges have also emerged which have tested this organisation as much as its member states. One such is the struggle against terrorism. Another challenge is climate change, where careful account must be taken of the risks facing smaller, more vulnerable nations, many of them from the Commonwealth.
Mr. President,
I started by talking about leadership. I have much admiration for those who have the talent to lead, particularly in public service and in diplomatic life, and I congratulate you, your colleagues and your predecessors on your many achievements.
It has perhaps always been the case that the waging of peace is the hardest form of leadership of all. I know of no single formula for success, but over the years I have observed that some attributes of leadership are universal, and are often about finding ways of encouraging people to combine their efforts, their talents, their insights, their enthusiasm and their inspiration, to work together.
Since I addressed you last, the Commonwealth, too, has grown vigorously to become a group of nations representing nearly two billion people. It gives its whole-hearted support to the significant contributions to the peace and stability of the world made by the United Nations and its Agencies. Last November, when I opened the Commonwealth Heads of Government Meeting in Trinidad and Tobago, I told the delegates that the Commonwealth had the opportunity to lead. Today I offer you the same message.
For over six decades the United Nations has helped to shape the international response to global dangers. The challenge now is to continue to show this clear and convening leadership while not losing sight of your ongoing work to secure the security, prosperity and dignity of our fellow human beings.
When people in fifty-three years from now look back on us, they will doubtless view many of our practices as old-fashioned. But it is my hope that, when judged by future generations, our sincerity, our willingness to take a lead, and our determination to do the right thing, will stand the test of time.
In my lifetime, the United Nations has moved from being a high-minded aspiration to being a real force for common good. That of itself has been a signal achievement. But we are not gathered here to reminisce. In tomorrow's world, we must all work together as hard as ever if we are truly to be United Nations.



I once knew someone who spent a year in a plaster cast recovering from an operation on his back. He read a lot, and thought a lot, and felt miserable.
Later, he realised this time of forced retreat from the world had helped him to understand the world more clearly.
We all need to get the balance right between action and reflection. With so many distractions, it is easy to forget to pause and take stock. Be it through contemplation, prayer, or even keeping a diary, many have found the practice of quiet personal reflection surprisingly rewarding, even discovering greater spiritual depth to their lives.
Reflection can take many forms. When families and friends come together at Christmas, it's often a time for happy memories and reminiscing. Our thoughts are with those we have loved who are no longer with us. We also remember those who through doing their duty cannot be at home for Christmas, such as workers in essential or emergency services.
And especially at this time of year we think of the men and women serving overseas in our armed forces. We are forever grateful to all those who put themselves at risk to keep us safe.
Service and duty are not just the guiding principles of yesteryear, they have an enduring value which spans the generations.
I myself had cause to reflect this year, at Westminster Abbey, on my own pledge of service made in that great church on Coronation Day sixty years earlier.
The anniversary reminded me of the remarkable changes that have occurred since the Coronation, many of them for the better, and of the things that have remained constant, such as the importance of family, friendship and good neighbourliness.
But reflection is not just about looking back. I and many others are looking forward to the Commonwealth Games in Glasgow next year.
The baton relay left London in October and is now the other side of the world, on its way across seventy nations and territories before arriving in Scotland next summer. Its journey is a reminder that the Commonwealth can offer us a fresh view of life.
My son Charles summed this up at the recent meeting in Sri Lanka. He spoke of the Commonwealth's family ties that are a source of encouragement to many. Like any family there can be differences of opinion. But however strongly they're expressed they are held within the common bond of friendship and shared experiences.
Here at home my own family is a little larger this Christmas.
As so many of you will know, the arrival of a baby gives everyone the chance to contemplate the future with renewed happiness and hope. For the new parents, life will never be quite the same again!
As with all who are christened, George was baptised into a joyful faith of Christian duty and service. After the christening, we gathered for the traditional photograph.
It was a happy occasion, bringing together four generations.
In the year ahead, I hope you will have time to pause for moments of quiet reflection. As the man in the plaster cast discovered, the results can sometimes be surprising.
For Christians, as for all people of faith, reflection, meditation and prayer help us to renew ourselves in God's love, as we strive daily to become better people. The Christmas message shows us that this love is for everyone. There is no one beyond its reach.
On the first Christmas, in the fields above Bethlehem, as they sat in the cold of night watching their resting sheep, the local shepherds must have had no shortage of time for reflection. Suddenly all this was to change. These humble shepherds were the first to hear and ponder the wondrous news of the birth of Christ, the first noel, the joy of which we celebrate today.
I wish you all a very happy Christmas.



Prince Philip and I have been deeply shocked and saddened by the loss of life and injuries after the terrorist attack in Brussels.
On behalf of the people of the United Kingdom, we send our most sincere condolences to you, the families of those who have died and all those in Belgium affected by this terrible series of events.



Sixty years ago today, I spoke about the speed of technological change, in what was my first televised Christmas broadcast.  At the time, it felt like a landmark,   
Television has made it possible for many of you to see me in your homes on Christmas Day. My own family often gather round to watch television as they are at this moment, and that is how I imagine you now.
Six decades on, the presenter of that broadcast has evolved somewhat, as has the technology she described.  Back then, who could have imagined that people would one day be following this Christmas message on laptops and mobile phones?  But I'm also struck by something that hasn't changed.  That, whatever the technology, many of you will be watching or listening to this at home. 
We think of our homes as places of warmth, familiarity and love, of shared stories and memories, which is perhaps why at this time of year so many return to where they grew up.  There is a timeless simplicity to the pull of home. 
For many, the idea of home reaches beyond a physical building, to a home town or city.  This Christmas, I think of London and Manchester, whose powerful identities shone through over the past twelve months in the face of appalling attacks.  In Manchester, those targeted included children who had gone to see their favourite singer.  A few days after the bombing, I had the privilege of meeting some of the young survivors and their parents.
I describe that hospital visit as a privilege because the patients I met were an example to us all, showing extraordinary bravery and resilience.  Indeed, many of those who survived the attack came together just days later for a benefit concert.  It was a powerful reclaiming of the ground, and of the city those young people call home. 
We expect our homes to be a place of safety, sanctuary even, which makes it all the more shocking when the comfort they provide is shattered.  A few weeks ago, The Prince of Wales visited the Caribbean in the aftermath of hurricanes that destroyed entire communities.  And here in London, who can forget the sheer awfulness of the Grenfell Tower fire? 
Our thoughts and prayers are with all those who died and those who lost so much, and we are indebted to members of the emergency services who risked their own lives, this past year, saving others.  Many of them, of course, will not be at home today because they are working, to protect us.
Reflecting on these events makes me grateful for the blessings of home and family, and in particular for 70 years of marriage.  I don't know that anyone had invented the term platinum for a 70th wedding anniversary when I was born.  You weren't expected to be around that long.  Even Prince Philip has decided it's time to slow down a little, having, as he economically put it, done his bit.  But I know his support and unique sense of humour will remain as strong as ever, as we enjoy spending time this Christmas with our family and look forward to welcoming new members into it next year. 
In 2018 I will open my home to a different type of family, the leaders of the fifty-two nations of the Commonwealth, as they gather in the UK for a summit.  The Commonwealth has an inspiring way of bringing people together, be it through the Commonwealth Games, which begins in a few months time on Australia's Gold Coast, or through bodies like the Commonwealth Youth Orchestra & Choir, a reminder of how truly vibrant this international family is. 
Today we celebrate Christmas, which itself is sometimes described as a festival of the home.  Families travel long distances to be together.  Volunteers and charities, as well as many churches, arrange meals for the homeless and those who would otherwise be alone on Christmas Day.     
We remember the birth of Jesus Christ whose only sanctuary was a stable in Bethlehem.  He knew rejection, hardship and persecution, and yet it is Jesus Christ's generous love and example which has inspired me through good times and bad.    Whatever your own experiences this year, wherever and however you are watching or listening, I wish you a peaceful and very happy Christmas. 



Last July we had the joy of seeing our eldest son married amid scenes of great happiness, which made 1981 a very special year for us. The wonderful response the wedding evoked was very moving.
Just before that there had been a very different scene here in the garden at Buckingham Palace when three and a half thousand disabled people, with their families, came to tea with us.
And, with members of my family, I have just met some more disabled people who came here to receive special cars which will give them the mobility they so desperately need. We handed over the keys of the new cars and also talked to handicapped people who have had their cars for some time.
The International Year of Disabled People has performed a very real service by focusing our attention on their problems. We have all become more aware of them and I'm sure that many of you, like myself, have been impressed by the courage they show.
There are, of course, many aspects of courage. There is the physical courage shown in war. Chesterton described it as almost a contradiction in terms, a strong desire to live taking the form of a readiness to die. It is sobering and inspiring to remember what man will do for an ideal in which he believes.
Bravery of this kind is shown in peace as well as in war. The armed forces and the police are showing it every day. So are the fire services, ambulance drivers, members of the public and even children, and the courage of the bomb disposal experts fills us with awe. All around us we see these acts of selflessness, people putting the life of someone else before their own.
Then there is perseverance, sticking to the job. This is how the disabled have learnt to cope with life, becoming better people in the process. Their courage in handling their difficulties and in many cases living an almost normal life, or making abnormal life normal, shows our own problems to be insignificant in comparison.
It is not only the disabled who are showing day-to-day perseverance and courage. This Christmas we should remember especially, the people of Northern Ireland who are attempting to live ordinary lives in times of strain and conflict, the unemployed who are trying to maintain their self-respect without work and to care for their families, and those from other parts of the Commonwealth who have come to Britain to make new lives but have not yet found themselves fully accepted.
Perhaps the greatest contribution of the disabled is to give the inspiration and incentive to do more to help others. From this we can gain the strength to try to do that little bit extra, as individuals, as members of our families and as nations.
We have seen in 1981 how many individuals have devoted themselves to trying to make life more tolerable for handicapped people, by giving loving care and by providing money and effort to improve facilities and to hasten research.
There are 450 million disabled people in the world, but wonderful work is being done in the prevention and cure of disablement. Diseases like polio and measles can be controlled by a very cheap multiple vaccine. In the last twelve years the Royal Commonwealth Society for the Blind has restored sight to over one million Commonwealth citizens.
But throughout this century there have been great advances in the awakening of conscience and concern for our fellow human beings. Governments now regard it as their duty to try to protect their people, through social services, from the worst effects of illness, bereavement, joblessness and disability.
We are also trying to reach beyond a nation's responsibility for its own citizens. There is a wide disparity between the wealth of nations and I have found that there is a spirit of eagerness to redress this throughout the world.
I have spoken of courage in its different forms and of the effect a display of courage can have on the world in which we live. Ultimately, however, we accept in our hearts that most important of all is moral courage.
As human beings we generally know what is right and how we should act and speak. But we are also very aware of how difficult it is to have the courage of our convictions.
Our Christian faith helps us to sustain those convictions. Christ not only revealed to us the truth in his teachings. He lived by what he believed and gave us the strength to try to do the same, and, finally, on the cross, he showed the supreme example of physical and moral courage.
That sacrifice was the dawn of Christianity and this is why at Christmas time we are inspired by the example of Christ as we celebrate his birth.
A few weeks ago I was sent this poem,
When all your world is torn with grief and strife  Think yet, when there seems nothing left to mend  The frail and time-worn fabric of your life,  The golden thread of courage has no end.
So to you all I say, God bless you, and a very happy Christmas.



For many people all over the world, the year 2001 seems to have brought them more than their fair share of trials and disasters.
There have been storms and droughts as well as epidemics and famine. And this country has not been spared, with the floods this time last year, and Foot and Mouth, which has had such devastating consequences for our farmers and rural communities.
They and others whose livelihoods have been affected continue to suffer hardship and anxiety long after the newspaper headlines have moved on.
But whilst many of these events were of natural origin, it was the human conflicts and the wanton acts of crime and terror against fellow human beings which have so appalled us all.
The terrorist outrages in the United States last September brought home to us the pain and grief of ordinary people the world over who find themselves innocently caught up in such evil.
During the following days we struggled to find ways of expressing our horror at what had happened. As so often in our lives at times of tragedy, just as on occasions of celebration and thanksgiving, we look to the Church to bring us together as a nation or as a community in commemoration and tribute.
It is to the Church that we turn to give meaning to these moments of intense human experience through prayer, symbol and ceremony.
In these circumstances so many of us, whatever our religion, need our faith more than ever to sustain and guide us. Every one of us needs to believe in the value of all that is good and honest, we need to let this belief drive and influence our actions.
All the major faiths tell us to give support and hope to others in distress. We in this country have tried to bring comfort to all those who were bereaved, or who suffered loss or injury in September's tragic events through those moving services at St Paul's and more recently at Westminster Abbey.
On these occasions and during the countless other acts of worship during this past year, we came together as a community, of relations, friends and neighbours, to draw strength in troubled times from those around us.
I believe that strong and open communities matter both in good times as well as bad. Certainly they provide a way of helping one another. I would like to pay tribute to so many of you who work selflessly for others in your neighbourhood needing care and support.
Communities also give us an important sense of belonging, which is a compelling need in all of us. We all enjoy moments of great happiness and suffer times of profound sadness, the happiness is heightened, the sadness softened when it is shared.
But there is more than that. A sense of belonging to a group, which has in common the same desire for a fair and ordered society, helps to overcome differences and misunderstanding by reducing prejudice, ignorance and fear.
We all have something to learn from one another, whatever our faith, be it Christian or Jewish, Muslim, Buddhist, Hindu or Sikh, whatever our background, whether we be young or old, from town or countryside.
This is an important lesson for us all during this festive season. For Christmas marks a moment to pause, to reflect and believe in the possibilities of rebirth and renewal.
Christ's birth in Bethlehem so long ago remains a powerful symbol of hope for a better future. After all the tribulations of this year, this is surely more relevant than ever.
As we come together amongst family and friends and look forward to the coming year, I hope that in the months to come we shall be able to find ways of strengthening our own communities as a sure support and comfort to us all, whatever may lie ahead.
May I, in this my fiftieth Christmas message to you, once again wish every one of you a very happy Christmas.



To look back is not necessarily to be nostalgic. When I come to Sandringham each year, I like to reflect on what Christmas must have been like when King Edward VII, my great-grandfather, and Queen Alexandra first came here as young parents.
I remember my own childhood Christmases here, with my father and mother, and a great family gathering, and now I delight in seeing my children and grandchildren enjoying the same traditions.
Christmas is the celebration of the birth of the founder of the Christian faith, an event which took place almost 2000 years ago, every year, at this time, we are asked to look back at that extraordinary story and remind ourselves of the message which inspired Christ's followers then, and which is just as relevant today.
At Christmas I enjoy looking back on some of the events of the year. Many have their roots in history but still have a real point for us today. I recall, especially, a dazzling spring day in Norwich when I attended the Maundy Service, the Cathedral providing a spectacular setting.
The lovely service is always a reminder of Christ's words to his disciples, Love one another, as I have loved you. It sounds so simple yet it proves so hard to obey.
In June came the Trooping the Colour, a vivid reminder of this country's proud military tradition, and of the discipline and dedication which our servicemen and women show in their taxing tasks of peace-keeping in many distant parts of the world.
Then, in October, I opened Parliament. This is not just a State occasion, but also a symbol of the process of parliamentary democracy which we enjoy here in Britain, and in so many countries of the Commonwealth. It is a process which seeks to express the ideal of the equality of all citizens under the law.
So, the past, with its traditions, has its lessons for us in 1996. And this year, in our travels, Prince Philip and I have also been looking to the future. I and all my family have always felt that one of our most important duties is to express, in our visits overseas, the goodwill of our country towards friends abroad, near and far.
So, last spring, we visited Poland and the Czech Republic, where we saw the development of democracy and prosperity in countries which only recently were communist-governed. And everywhere we received the best of welcomes. In the autumn we went to Thailand, where we renewed old friendships and witnessed the blending of tradition with a dynamic commercial spirit.
There was also a happy visit to this country by the President of France. And I shall never forget the State Visit of President Mandela. The most gracious of men has shown us all how to accept the facts of the past without bitterness, how to see new opportunities as more important than old disputes and how to look forward with courage and optimism.
His example is a continuing inspiration to the whole Commonwealth and to all those everywhere who work for peace and reconciliation.
This, I know, has been a difficult year for many families. Discord, sickness, bereavement, even tragedy have touched all too many lives. We recall, with sadness and bewilderment, the horror of Dunblane and Port Arthur. We watch anxiously as violence threatens again to disrupt the lives of the people of Northern Ireland.
In difficult times, it is tempting for all of us, especially those who suffer, to look back and say if only. But to look back in that way is to look down a blind alley. Better to look forward and say if only.
If only we can live up to the example of the child who was born at Christmas with a love that came to embrace the whole world. If only we can let him recapture for us that time when we faced the future with childhood's unbounded faith.
Armed with that faith, the New Year, with all its challenges and chances, should hold no terrors for us, and we should be able to embark upon it undaunted.
My family joins me in wishing each one of you a very Happy Christmas.



Colonels Commandant, Officers and All Ranks of the Royal Tank Regiment,
As your Colonel-in-Chief, I am delighted to be presenting new Standards to you this afternoon. On a similar occasion in 1960, when an earlier generation, some of whom are watching today, paraded in this Garden, I spoke of how the Royal Tank Regiment had been at the forefront of the development of armoured warfare. There have of course been changes in the many years since, the Regiment has operated with great success in a wider range of roles than might have been imagined then, and, when Standards were last presented to you at Sennelager in 1985, there were still four Regiments.
The two remaining Regiments are motivated by the same esprit de corps and professional reputation for which the Royal Tank Regiment has been known throughout its history. I may say that those qualities are clearly evident in each and every one of you on parade today. They are also attributes which are instantly recognisable to your Regimental family, so strongly represented here.
In recent years the Royal Tank Regiment has seen operational service in Northern Ireland, Bosnia, Kosovo, Iraq and Afghanistan. These considerable achievements are a source of enormous pride but, inevitably, do not come without cost. Families and loved ones play an essential part in supporting these operations but also carry a difficult burden. To them, as your Colonel-in-Chief, I should like to pay a special tribute.
I congratulate you all on your distinguished service and for your bearing and smartness on parade today.
My best wishes to you all, and Fear Naught



I am delighted to be here at Heathrow today, to join these special celebrations and formally to declare Terminal Five ready for business.
Looking around this bright and airy space with its clean, efficient layout, I am sure that many millions of travellers will have reason to be appreciative of the thought and care that has gone into the design, construction, and ongoing maintenance of this significant new terminal. It provides an encouraging illustration of what can be achieved through working in partnership, and it says a good deal about how the essential considerations of passenger comfort, effective security, and quality of service, can be combined with the ever more important requirement of environmental responsibility.
My warmest congratulations go to everyone who has worked on this highly impressive building, it embodies many achievements, of which you can all be rightly proud.
So today, it gives me great pleasure to open Terminal Five, this twenty-first century gateway to Britain, and, for us, to the wider world.



President Museveni, Prime Minister Gonzi, Secretary-General, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you for your kind words of welcome. I am delighted to be joining you here in Kampala and to see for myself a Commonwealth in such good health. This is the last such occasion to profit from the leadership of Don McKinnon as Commonwealth Secretary-General. He has brought energy and passion to the stewardship of the Commonwealth through the first years of a new century. His determination to preserve and promote the relevance of the Commonwealth in the service of its two billion people has been truly outstanding. Secretary-General, we owe you a very substantial debt and will miss you greatly.
When I first addressed a meeting of Heads of Government of the Commonwealth thirty years ago, Papua New Guinea and the Seychelles were welcomed as its 32nd and 33rd members. Since then, our association has continued to attract new members while addressing the great preoccupations and concerns of our times.
Uganda's rich history is longer. Humankind has been present here as far back as our archaeology and history will allow us to go. And just as the people and ideas that originated in this part of Africa spread out to other parts of the globe, so too the wider world has come to touch the lives of Ugandans. This week, it comes here to Kampala in the form of the Commonwealth.
The theme chosen for this CHOGM, Transforming Societies, conveys a clear commitment to change for the better. No single society has achieved perfection, and there is no single recipe for success. No-one could expect that. But we do know that giving people the greatest possible voice in the way they are governed, and the greatest possible access to education, are two of the most important ingredients.
Our Commonwealth theme over the whole of this year is Respecting Difference, Promoting Understanding Recognising that each one of us is made up of layer upon layer of identity and that each of our unique personalities has ties to culture, religion, community, country and beyond, is the essence of open and tolerant communities. I hope that, in your discussion about transforming societies, you will consider this abiding principle, that we should treat those around us as we would wish to be treated ourselves.
That is the case for governments, as for communities, as for us all individually. Moreover, the importance we all attach to dialogue, to hearing the voices of governments but also many of the other voices in society, to respect for fundamental human rights. These qualities still place the Commonwealth in a strong position to lead.
I am especially pleased that, this year, fresh attention is being turned to young people, who make up nearly half of the Commonwealth's population. The conclusions drawn from the Youth Forum earlier this week show an almost limitless optimism and enthusiasm. This is an energy that should be tapped more fully. Young people can and should play a part in the many global challenges that cannot be resolved by older generations alone, whether in the Commonwealth as a whole or in each of its member countries.
President Museveni, you will be familiar with the Ugandan proverb which says, Those who walk together warn each other. In its sense of unity giving strength, this could just as easily be a Commonwealth proverb as a Ugandan one. Over the next two days, I wish you and your fellow leaders well in continuing the Commonwealth tradition of strength in our diversity as well as strength in our unity.



The remarkable re-birth of this great and gleaming station means that people across the whole of Britain, not just the south-east, are suddenly quite a bit closer to Europe. From now on, Sheffield is closer to Paris, Nottingham closer to Brussels. And as we look forward to the London Olympics in 2012, it is good to know that a journey from here to the new High Speed 1 station at Stratford will take spectators a mere seven minutes. All these things will bring real differences to people's lives.
My warmest congratulations go to everyone involved in this project, which is a wonderful illustration of what can be achieved through working in partnership, and it says a good deal about how we can take a twenty-first century approach whilst at the same time having due consideration of our heritage. Looking around me I am filled with hope that people of all backgrounds and ages, some of whom are not yet born, and most of whom we will never meet, will greatly benefit from the quality and the attention to detail which is at the heart of this significant undertaking, and will come to regard St. Pancras not just as a station but as a destination.
It gives me great pleasure to officially launch High Speed 1, Britain's first High Speed Railway and to re-open this magnificent station, St. Pancras International.



Governor Kaine, Members of the General Assembly, Ladies and Gentlemen
Thank you for your generous welcome to Virginia. Prince Philip and I are delighted to be here in your State Capitol today, designed by that great Virginian Thomas Jefferson and so painstakingly restored over recent years. I would like to congratulate everyone involved in this most impressive project.
As a State and as a Nation you are still coming to terms with the dreadful events at Virginia Tech on the sixteenth of April. My heart goes out to the students, friends and families of all those killed, and to the many others who have been affected, some of whom I shall be meeting shortly. On behalf of the people of the United Kingdom I extend my deepest sympathies at this time of such grief and sorrow.
I visit the United States this week to commemorate the four hundredth anniversary of the landing of a small group of British citizens on a tiny island in what is now called the James River here in Virginia. With the benefit of hindsight, we can see in that event the origins of a singular endeavour, the building of a great nation, founded on the eternal values of democracy and equality based on the rule of law and the promotion of freedom.
But we should always be cautious of hindsight. Four hundred years ago, it was by no means preordained that this venture would succeed. Recent archaeological work has modified our understanding of the original settlement at Jamestown, about the choice of its location and the kind of people who came. While it remains difficult to say what it was about those early years which caught that vital moment in the evolution of this great country, it must surely have had something to do with the ingenuity, the drive and the idealism of that group of adventurers who first set foot on this fertile Virginian soil and the will of the native Powhatan people to find ways to co-exist.
When I visited fifty years ago, we celebrated the three hundred and fiftieth Anniversary largely from the perspective of those settlers, in terms of the exploration of new worlds, the spread of values and of the English language, and the sacrifice of those early pioneers. These remain great attributes and we still appreciate their impact today.
But fifty years on we are now in a position to reflect more candidly on the Jamestown legacy. Human progress rarely comes without cost. And those early years in Jamestown, when three great civilisations came together for the first time, Western European, Native American and African, released a train of events which continues to have a profound social impact, not only in the United States, but also in the United Kingdom and Europe.
Over the course of my reign, and certainly since I first visited Jamestown in 1957, my country has become a much more diverse society, just as the Commonwealth of Virginia and the whole United States of America have also undergone major social change. The melting pot metaphor captures one of the great strengths of your country and is an inspiration to others around the world as we face the continuing social challenges ahead.
It is right that we continue to reassess the meaning of historical events in the changing context of the present, not least in this the two hundredth anniversary in the United Kingdom of the Act of Parliament to abolish the transatlantic Slave Trade. But such reassessments should not obscure one enduring consequence of Jamestown. This four hundredth anniversary marks a moment to recognise the deep friendship which exists between our two countries. Friendship is a complex concept. It means being able to debate openly, disagree on occasion, surmount both good times and bad, safe in the knowledge that the bonds that draw us together, of history, understanding and warm regard, are far stronger than any temporary differences of opinion.
The people of the United Kingdom have such a relationship with the people of this great nation. It is one of the most durable international collaborations anywhere in the world at any time in history, a friendship for which I certainly in my lifetime have had good cause to be thankful. That is a lasting legacy of Jamestown, that is something worth commemorating, and that is why I am pleased to be here today.



Prime Minister and Premier, Ladies and Gentlemen,
Thank you for welcoming Prince Philip and me so warmly to Canada and to Saskatchewan. We would like in turn to send a message of greetings to you all as we come together to celebrate the Centennials of both Saskatchewan and Alberta.
May I also express my appreciation to you, Prime Minister, for the gift you have offered to mark my visit. The Memory Project has most successfully brought together veterans and young Canadians throughout the country. In the process it has safeguarded not only many remarkable stories of the veterans, but also a unique chapter of this country's history.
It is a most imaginative gift, it links the admiration I have for those who fought for freedom all those years ago with the confidence and pride I feel when I look into the faces of young Canadians today.
It fits well with the theme chosen for this visit, to acknowledge The Spirit of Nation Builders. And what better place could there be than the vast Canadian prairies to pay homage to those ancestors, beginning with the First Nations and Metis Peoples, who shaped the country with a common vision and with a determination to build a better life for themselves, and a better country for their children and grandchildren.
This is my twenty-second journey to Canada, but the memories of my first visit are still fresh in my mind. I remember the magnitude of this country, matched only by the generosity and kindness of the people whom I met along the way, not least here. Since then, Prince Philip and I have seen Saskatchewan evolve into a forward-looking province of fertile landscapes, dynamic towns and cities with expanding, diverse communities taking great pride in what you have built, and continue to build, together.
May I take this opportunity to salute an exceptional group of people who have been with me on all my visits, the Royal Canadian Mounted Police. While the scarlet tunic of the Mountie has come to symbolise Canada throughout the world, it is the Mountie's dedication to service and honour that embodies the spirit of so many of those who have built this nation as we now know it.
Tomorrow, Prince Philip and I will attend a memorial service at Depot Division here in Regina. Along with all Canadians, we will pay tribute to the four courageous members of the Force who died in the line of duty last March.
Today, there will be a happier event to mark, thanks once again to the men and women of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police. In 1969, they gave me a most generous gift, a black mare named Burmese whom I rode for eighteen years. It will give me great pleasure to unveil a statue of Burmese here outside the Legislature to mark this Centennial.
When we were last here in 1987, I spoke of the Crown in the daily life of Canada, of my role as your Queen and my bond with this land and its people. I spoke then as much to the youth of Saskatchewan as to their parents and grandparents.
Just eighteen years later I am pleased to learn that some of those young people whom I addressed then are now active in shaping the life of this province in the twenty-first century. From their ranks are coming some of the dynamic leaders of every profession who are placing Saskatchewan so firmly on the national and global stage.
Premier, you have noted the role of the Crown as a symbol of national identity for Canada and Saskatchewan. To others, one of the strongest and most valued assets of the Crown is the stability and continuity it can bring from the past into the present. My mother once said that this country felt like a home away from home for the Queen of Canada. Ladies and gentlemen, six decades later it still does, and it is good to be back.
May God continue to bless Saskatchewan. Et que Dieu bénisse le Canada.



Dr. Hampton and Officials of the First Nations University of Canada,
This stone was taken from the grounds of Balmoral Castle in the Highlands of Scotland, a place dear to my great great grandmother, Queen Victoria. It symbolises the foundation of the rights of First Nations peoples reflected in treaties signed with the Crown during her reign.
Bearing the cipher of Queen Victoria as well as my own, this stone is presented to the First Nations University of Canada in the hope that it will serve as a reminder of the special relationship between the Sovereign and all First Nations peoples.



Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen,
I am delighted to welcome you, Mr. President, and Mrs Roh to London today.
Prince Philip and I were very pleased to visit the Republic of Korea five years ago, and recall with much satisfaction the warmth of the reception we received from Korean people wherever we went. It is a great pleasure to be able to return some of that hospitality tonight.
During our visit in 1999, we were able to witness the remarkable recovery your country was making after the crisis which had had such a devastating impact on economies across the region two years earlier. I was struck by the spirit of the Korean people, and their determination to overcome adversity. We have seen how that determination has paid dividends, taking the Republic of Korea to its position as one of the world's leading economies. The Korean people are right to be proud of this achievement.
At the start of my own reign, the Korean War was still being fought. We remember all those who died during that terrible conflict, which ended with the division of the Korean peninsula.
Sadly, more than fifty years on, the peninsula remains divided, generations of families remain separated, and lasting peace remains elusive. Mr. President, I look forward to the day when the Korean people are once again united in peace, and the entire peninsula is able to prosper for the benefit of its citizens.
We recognise the difficulties in reaching that destiny. There are many obstacles to be overcome, but that same determination and positive spirit will ensure that Korea is well equipped to meet the challenges which lie ahead. You will also have the support of many international friends, including the United Kingdom.
The bilateral relationship between our countries, formally dating back one hundred and twenty years, is now stronger and more varied than ever, as our exchange of State Visits reflects. In particular, our countries have developed a prosperous economic relationship, which has seen major investment in both directions, as well as important and growing links in the areas of science and technology.
We have embarked on joint research and development projects, and continue to co-operate in many other fields. We also welcome the many thousands of students from Korea who choose to study in the United Kingdom each year, and the increasing cultural exchanges between our two countries.
The partnership between the United Kingdom and the Republic of Korea extends also to addressing international issues of concern. The contribution of Korean troops to reconstruction efforts in Afghanistan and Iraq, and the active role which Korea plays in global affairs, has earned your country great respect. We share many principles on those issues, and we see your country as a true friend and ally.
Mr. President, Mrs. Roh, I warmly welcome you both to this country.  Ladies and Gentlemen, I ask you all to raise your glasses to,
The President and the people of the Republic of Korea.


Like all the best families, we have our share of eccentricities, of impetuous and wayward youngsters and of family disagreements.
It's all to do with the training, you can do a lot if you're properly trained.
We lost the American colonies because we lacked the statesmanship to know the right time and the manner of yielding what is impossible to keep.
I myself prefer my New Zealand eggs for breakfast.
In remembering the appalling suffering of war on both sides, we recognise how precious is the peace we have built in Europe since 1945.


Family does not necessarily mean blood relatives but often a description of a community, organization or nation.
We all need to get the balance right between action and reflection. With so many distractions, it is easy to forget to pause and take stock. 
Let us not take ourselves too seriously. None of us has a monopoly on wisdom. 
Work is the rent you pay for the room you occupy on earth. 
I simply ache from smiling. Why are women expected to beam all the time? It's unfair. If a man looks solemn, it's automatically assumed he's a serious person, not a miserable one. 
I know of no single formula for success. But over the years I have observed that some attributes of leadership are universal and are often about finding ways of encouraging people to combine their efforts, their talents, their insights, their enthusiasm and their inspiration to work together. 
It has perhaps always been the case that the waging of peace is the hardest form of leadership of all. 
When life seems hard, the courageous do not lie down and accept defeat, instead, they are all the more determined to struggle for a better future. 
The upward course of a nation's history is due in the long run to the soundness of heart of its average men and women. 
The lessons from the peace process are clear, whatever life throws at us, our individual responses will be all the stronger for working together and sharing the load. 
Grief is the price we pay for love.
It has always been easy to hate and destroy, to build and to cherish is much more difficult.
Good memories are our second chance at happiness.
It has been women who have breathed gentleness and care into the hard progress of humankind.
There are long periods when life seems a small, dull round, a petty business with no point, and then suddenly we are caught up in some great event which gives us a glimpse of the solid and durable foundations of our existence.
Cowards falter, but danger is often overcome by those who nobly dare.
In the turbulence of this anxious and active world many people are leading uneventful, lonely lives. To them dreariness, not disaster, is the enemy. They seldom realize that on their steadfastness, on their ability to withstand the fatigue of dull repetitive work, and on their courage in meeting constant small adversities depend in great measure the happiness and prosperity of the community as a whole. 
Indeed, sadly, it seems that it is tragedy that often draws out the most and the best from the human spirit.
What were once only hopes for the future have now come to pass.
I have to be seen to be believed.
